Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3870.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 GENERAL EDUCATION Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120A.05, subdivision 10a, is amended to read: Subd. 10a. Kindergarten. "Kindergarten" means a deleted text begin programdeleted text end new text begin gradenew text end designed for pupils five years of age on new text begin or before new text end September 1 of the calendar year in which the school year commences that new text begin provides a developmentally appropriate learning experience and new text end prepares pupils to enter first grade the following school year. Sec. 2. new text begin [120A.391] EDUCATION OF CHILDREN EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "child experiencing homelessness" means a child, including a child attending a public preschool, who lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence, including: new text end new text begin (1) a child sharing housing with other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or similar reason; new text end new text begin (2) a child living in a motel, hotel, or camping ground due to lack of alternative adequate accommodations; new text end new text begin (3) a child living in an emergency or transitional shelter; new text end new text begin (4) a child abandoned in a hospital; new text end new text begin (5) a child living in a car, park, public space, abandoned building, substandard housing, bus or train station, or similar setting; and new text end new text begin (6) a migratory child who qualifies as homeless under the circumstances described in clauses (1) to (5). new text end new text begin (b) The term "child experiencing homelessness" includes children and youth experiencing homelessness. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this section shall conflict with or supersede the requirements under section 256K.45 as it relates to educational services for homeless youth. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Identification and enrollment. new text end new text begin (a) Each school district and charter school must establish procedures to identify a child experiencing homelessness as defined in subdivision 1 and must designate a homeless liaison to ensure the implementation and coordination of the services described in this section. Upon identification of a child experiencing homelessness, a school district must immediately enroll the child in school, even if the child cannot produce records otherwise required for enrollment, such as previous academic records, immunization or medical records, proof of residency, or other documentation. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "enrollment" means attending classes and participating fully in school activities. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "immediately" means enrollment must occur within one school day. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Educational services and supports. new text end new text begin School districts and charter schools must provide a child experiencing homelessness with educational services and supports designed to meet the unique needs of the child, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) educational services comparable to those offered to other children; new text end new text begin (2) transportation to and from the school of origin when in the child's best interest as provided under section 120A.20, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (3) removal of barriers to school enrollment and attendance, which may include providing access to school supplies, meals, and other services necessary to ensure educational access; and new text end new text begin (4) coordination by the designated homeless liaison with housing services, social services, mental health agencies, and other community service providers to ensure continuity of services and supports. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin School stability and best interest determination. new text end new text begin When it is in the child's best interest, a child experiencing homelessness may remain in their school of origin for the duration of homelessness or through the end of any academic year in which they obtain permanent housing. A school district must presume that remaining in the school of origin is in the child's best interest unless it is contrary to the wishes of the child's parent, guardian, or unaccompanied homeless youth. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Records transfer and dispute resolution. new text end new text begin (a) School districts and charter schools must immediately transfer educational and health records for a child experiencing homelessness to ensure continuity of appropriate educational services. new text end new text begin (b) If a dispute arises over school selection or enrollment, the child must be immediately enrolled in the school requested by the child's parent, guardian, or unaccompanied homeless youth, pending resolution of the dispute. The school district must provide the child's parent, guardian, or unaccompanied homeless youth with a written explanation of its decision, and a notice of the right to appeal, including information about how to initiate an appeal. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Unaccompanied homeless youth. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "unaccompanied homeless youth" means a child or youth experiencing homelessness not in the physical custody of a parent or guardian. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [120A.392] EDUCATION OF MIGRATORY CHILDREN. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "migratory child" means a child who has moved due to economic necessity in the preceding 36 months across school district lines either within the state of Minnesota or from another state to engage in temporary or seasonal agricultural or fishing work or to accompany or join a parent, guardian, or other family member who moved to engage in temporary or seasonal agricultural or fishing work. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Identification and enrollment. new text end new text begin Each school district or charter school shall establish procedures to identify migratory children as defined in subdivision 1. Upon identification of a migratory child, the school district must immediately enroll the child in school, even if the child cannot produce records normally required for enrollment, such as previous academic records, health records, proof of residency, or other documentation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Educational services. new text end new text begin School districts and charter schools shall provide migratory children with educational services designed to meet their unique needs, including but not limited to: (1) supplemental academic instruction; (2) support services to address educational disruption; and (3) coordination with other educational programs and services. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Continuity of services. new text end new text begin School districts and charter schools shall ensure continuity of educational services by expediting the transfer of educational and health records for migratory children and implementing procedures to facilitate enrollment and appropriate course placement. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124D.111, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Federal child and adult care food program and federal summer food service program; criteria and notice; board of directors; salaries. (a) The commissioner must post on the department's website eligibility criteria and application information for nonprofit organizations interested in applying to the commissioner for approval as a multisite sponsoring organization under the federal child and adult care food program and federal summer food service program. The posted criteria and information must inform interested nonprofit organizations about: (1) the criteria the commissioner uses to approve or disapprove an application, including how an applicant demonstrates financial viability for the Minnesota program, among other criteria; (2) the commissioner's process and time line for notifying an applicant when its application is approved or disapproved and, if the application is disapproved, the explanation the commissioner provides to the applicant; and (3) any appeal or other recourse available to a disapproved applicant. (b) The commissioner must evaluate financial eligibility as part of the application process. An organization applying to be a prospective nonprofit multisite sponsoring organization for the federal child and adult care food program or the federal summer food service program must provide documentation of financial viability as an organization. Documentation must include: (1) evidence that the organization has operated for at least one year and has filed at least one tax return; (2) the most recent tax return submitted by the organization and corresponding forms and financial statements; (3) a profit and loss statement and balance sheet or similar financial information; and (4) evidence that at least ten percent of the organization's operating revenue comes from sources other than the United States Department of Agriculture child nutrition program and that the organization has additional funds or a performance bond available to cover at least one month of reimbursement claims. (c) When a nonprofit organization applies for sponsorship as a multisite sponsoring organization under the federal child and adult care food program or federal summer food service program, applications are evaluated on the following criteria in addition to federal requirements: (1) any sponsor that applies to receive reimbursement over the federal single audit threshold, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 2, section 200, must ensure a minimum of one full-time equivalent financial director, or similar role, for the organization. This position must be solely dedicated to the responsibilities of a financial director, or similar role, and be separate from any other position within the organization; (2) volunteers must not be allowed to make organization-level decisions, monitor sites, or provide financial oversight. Board members, whether paid or unpaid, are not considered volunteers; and (3) unless granted special approval by the commissioner, sponsoring organizations are limited to an annual maximum increase of 25 percent new text begin per program new text end for the number of sponsored sites and total reimbursement. (d) A nonprofit multisite sponsoring organization must be governed by a board of directors consistent with the following requirements: (1) board bylaws must outline the procedures for changing the governance structure, following the requirements of chapter 317A;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (2) board of director meetings must comply with chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 13D deleted text end deleted text begin governing open meetings; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end a nonprofit multisite sponsoring organization must publish and maintain: (i) the meeting minutes of the board of directors and of members and committees having board-delegated authority, within 30 days following the earlier of the date of board approval or the next regularly scheduled meeting, and for at least 365 days from the date of publication; and (ii) directory information for the board of directors and for the members of committees having board-delegated authority. (e) The commissioner must post annually on the department's website the approved salary range for the positions of executive director, financial director, monitoring staff, administrative staff, and officer-level positions for multisite sponsoring organizations under the federal child and adult care food program and federal summer food service program. Salaries charged to the nonprofit food service fund must fall within these ranges. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.119, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Summer Food Service Program applications. new text end new text begin Consistent with Code of Federal Regulations, title 7, part 225, nonprofit organizations applying as new sponsors of the Summer Food Service Program must submit an application to the commissioner by May 1. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must renumber Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.111, subdivision 2a, as Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.119, subdivision 7. The revisor must also make necessary cross-reference changes consistent with the renumbering. new text end ARTICLE 2 EDUCATION EXCELLENCE Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.021, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Standards development. (a) The commissioner must consider advice from at least the following stakeholders in developing statewide rigorous core academic standards in language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, including history, geography, economics, government and citizenship, health, and the arts: (1) parents of school-age children and members of the public throughout the state; (2) teachers throughout the state currently licensed and providing instruction in language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, health, or the arts and licensed elementary and secondary school principals throughout the state currently administering a school site; (3) currently serving members of local school boards and charter school boards throughout the state; (4) faculty teaching core subjects at postsecondary institutions in Minnesota; (5) representatives of the Minnesota business community; (6) representatives from the Tribal Nations Education Committee and Tribal Nations and communities in Minnesota, including both Anishinaabe and Dakota; and (7) current students, with input from the Minnesota Youth Council. (b) Academic standards must: (1) be clear, concise, objective,new text begin andnew text end measurabledeleted text begin , and grade-level appropriatedeleted text end ; (2) not require a specific teaching methodology or curriculum; and (3) be consistent with the Constitutions of the United States and the state of Minnesota. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.022, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. State bilingual and multilingual seals. (a) Consistent with efforts to strive for comprehensive achievement and civic readiness under sections 120B.11 and 124E.03, subdivision 2, paragraph (i), and close the academic achievement and opportunity gap under sections 124D.861 and 124D.862, voluntary state bilingual and multilingual seals are established to recognize graduating high school students in any school district, charter school, or nonpublic school who demonstrate particular levels of proficiency in one or more languages other than English. The levels of proficiency established under this subdivision are based on the ACTFL's proficiency guidelines. A student is eligible for a seal in a language other than English if the student demonstrates proficiency derived from assessment in the domains of listening, reading, speaking, and writing on an assessment aligned with ACTFL proficiency guidelines or on an equivalent valid and reliable assessment at a level required under paragraph (c). Indigenous American Indian languages and American Sign Language are languages other than English for purposes of this subdivision and world languages for purposes of subdivision 1a. (b) In addition to paragraph (a), to be eligible to receive a seal students must satisfactorily complete all required English language arts credits. (c) Consistent with this subdivision, a high school student who demonstrates an overall intermediate high ACTFL level of proficiency derived from assessment in the domains of listening, reading, speaking, and writing in one language in addition to English is eligible to receive the state bilingual gold seal. A high school student who demonstrates an overall intermediate high ACTFL level of proficiency derived from assessment in the domains of listening, reading, speaking, and writing in more than one language in addition to English is eligible to receive the state multilingual gold seal. A high school student who demonstrates an overall advanced-low or above ACTFL level of proficiency derived from assessment in the domains of listening, reading, speaking, and writing in one language in addition to English is eligible to receive the state bilingual platinum seal. A high school student who demonstrates an overall advanced-low or above ACTFL level of proficiency derived from assessment in the domains of listening, reading, speaking, and writing in more than one language in addition to English is eligible to receive the state multilingual platinum seal. (d) School districts and charter schools may give students periodic opportunities to demonstrate their level of proficiency in listening, speaking, reading, and writing in a language in addition to English. Where valid and reliable assessments new text begin aligned with ACTFL proficiency guidelines new text end are unavailablenew text begin for all four domainsnew text end ,new text begin the department must establish alternate options to assess a student's level of non-English language proficiency under this section. The department must publish the alternate options and detailed guidelines for implementation that ensure consistency and maintain alignment with ACTFL proficiency standards. Alternate assessment options may include but are not limited to:new text end new text begin (1)new text end a school district or charter school may rely on evaluators trained in assessing under ACTFL proficiency guidelines deleted text begin to assess a student's level of non-English language proficiency under this section.deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) portfolio assessment that demonstrates proficiency across multiple domains; or new text end new text begin (3) modified assessment requirements for languages where cultural or structural factors make traditional four-domain assessment inappropriate, as determined by the commissioner in consultation with language communities. new text end new text begin (e) new text end School districts and charter schools must maintain appropriate records to identify high school students eligible to receive the state bilingual or multilingual gold and platinum seals upon graduation. The school district or charter school must notate the appropriate seal to the transcript of each high school student who meets the requirements of this subdivision and may affix the seal to the student's diploma. A school district or charter school must not charge the high school student a fee for this seal. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end A school district or charter school may award elective course credits in world languages to a student who demonstrates the requisite proficiency in a language other than English under this section. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A school district or charter school may award community service credit to a student who demonstrates an overall intermediate high or above ACTFL level of proficiency derived from assessment in the domains of listening, reading, speaking, and writing in a language other than English and who participates in community service activities that are integrated into the curriculum, involve the participation of teachers, and support biliteracy in the school or local community. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end The commissioner must list on the web page the assessments that are aligned to ACTFL proficiency guidelines, and establish guidelines on interpreting the scores or ratings from approved assessments. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end By August 1, 2015, the colleges and universities of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities system must establish criteria to translate the seals into college credits based on the world language course equivalencies identified by the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities faculty and staff and, upon request from an enrolled student, the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities may award foreign language credits to a student who received a Minnesota World Language Proficiency Certificate or Minnesota Bilingual or Multilingual Seals under subdivision 1a. A student who demonstrated the requisite level of language proficiency in grade 10, 11, or 12 to receive a seal or certificate and is enrolled in a Minnesota State Colleges and Universities institution must request college credits for the student's seal or proficiency certificate within three academic years after graduating from high school. The University of Minnesota is encouraged to award students foreign language academic credits consistent with this paragraph. Sec. 3. new text begin [120B.091] MINNESOTA CIVIC SEAL DESIGNATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) A Minnesota Civic Seal designation is established for high school students who have demonstrated excellence in civics education and engagement. The purpose of this designation is to encourage civic learning, promote active participation in democratic institutions, and recognize students who have achieved a high level of civic knowledge, skills, and community involvement. new text end new text begin (b) A student must meet the following minimum criteria to be awarded the Minnesota Civic Seal: new text end new text begin (1) complete activities across multiple areas of civic competency, including democratic engagement, civic knowledge, media literacy, community service, and bridge building, with demonstrated proficiency in each area; new text end new text begin (2) complete a civics-related project that involves research, planning, and action on a community issue, resulting in measurable civic impact or engagement; and new text end new text begin (3) complete a reflection that evaluates the learning experience, impact, and personal growth gained from civic engagement activities. new text end new text begin (c) The criteria must be broad enough for any student in any region or community of the state to be able to earn the seal without having to spend personal resources to access the criteria or activity. No specific out-of-school or partisan civic program or provider shall be named or required as specific criteria. A school district or individual school must not be obligated to participate in offering or awarding a Minnesota Civic Seal designation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minnesota Civic Seal Council. new text end new text begin (a) A Minnesota Civic Seal Council is established to oversee the implementation and ongoing development of the Minnesota Civic Seal designation. The council shall be led by the YMCA Center for Youth Voice. new text end new text begin (b) The council membership must include: new text end new text begin (1) the secretary of state or designee, who shall serve as chair; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of education or designee; new text end new text begin (3) two civic educators representing different regions of the state; new text end new text begin (4) two professional development providers with expertise in civics education; new text end new text begin (5) two high school students who have earned or are working toward the Minnesota Civic Seal; new text end new text begin (6) one representative from an institution of higher education; new text end new text begin (7) two civic engagement experts or representatives from nonprofit organizations focused on democracy education or youth civic engagement; and new text end new text begin (8) two members as determined appropriate by the secretary of state. new text end new text begin (c) The YMCA Center for Youth Voice appoints the members listed in paragraph (b), clauses (3) to (7), from among applicants who have submitted applications to serve through the secretary of state's application portal. new text end new text begin (d) The council shall: new text end new text begin (1) establish and periodically review specific criteria and guidelines for awarding the Minnesota Civic Seal; new text end new text begin (2) provide guidance and support to all schools implementing the Minnesota Civic Seal designation; new text end new text begin (3) ensure the criteria remain broad and accessible to students from all regions and backgrounds; new text end new text begin (4) review and approve program implementation plans submitted by participating schools; new text end new text begin (5) promote awareness of the Minnesota Civic Seal designation among students, educators, and communities; and new text end new text begin (6) submit a report annually by September 1 to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education on program participation, outcomes, and recommendations for improvement. new text end new text begin (e) Members of the council shall serve without compensation. new text end new text begin (f) Members of the council shall serve for a term of three years or until the member no longer meets the requirement of the role, whichever is sooner. new text end new text begin (g) The council shall meet at least twice annually, with additional meetings as called by the chair. new text end new text begin (h) This subdivision expires December 31, 2036. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin School participation. new text end new text begin (a) Participation is optional for any high school to offer the Minnesota Civic Seal designation. A school that offers or awards a Minnesota Civic Seal designation must: new text end new text begin (1) provide information to all high school students regarding the opportunity to earn the Minnesota Civic Seal and the criteria for being awarded the recognition; and new text end new text begin (2) record the designation on the official transcript of each student who earns the Minnesota Civic Seal. new text end new text begin (b) A school must not charge a fee to a student or the student's family for participation in earning the Minnesota Civic Seal. new text end new text begin (c) A school must notify the council of its intent to offer or award a Minnesota Civic Seal designation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Seal and recognition. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of education must publish the Minnesota Civic Seal designation requirements adopted by the council on the department's website. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may also provide additional materials to schools to recognize and celebrate students who achieve the Minnesota Civic Seal designation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2027-2028 academic school year and applies to students graduating in 2028 and later. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.11, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section and section 120B.10, the following terms have the meanings given deleted text begin themdeleted text end . (a) "Instruction" means methods of providing learning experiences that enable a student to meet state and district academic standards and graduation requirements including applied and experiential learning. (b) "Curriculum" means district or school adopted programs and written plans for providing students with learning experiences that lead to expected knowledge and skills and career and college readiness. (c) "Comprehensive achievement and civic readiness" means striving to: deleted text begin meet school readiness goalsdeleted text end new text begin create developmentally appropriate early learning experiencesnew text end ; close the academic achievement gap among all racial and ethnic groups of students and between students living in poverty and students not living in poverty; have all students attain career and college readiness before graduating from high school; have all students graduate from high school; and prepare students to be lifelong learners. (d) "Experiential learning" means learning for students that includes career exploration through a specific class or course or through work-based experiences such as job shadowing, mentoring, entrepreneurship, service learning, volunteering, internships, other cooperative work experience, youth apprenticeship, or employment. (e) "Ethnic studies" as defined in section 120B.25 has the same meaning for purposes of this section. Ethnic studies curriculum may be integrated in existing curricular opportunities or provided through additional curricular offerings. (f) "Antiracist" means actively working to identify and eliminate racism in all forms in order to change policies, behaviors, and beliefs that perpetuate racist ideas and actions. (g) "Culturally sustaining" means integrating content and practices that infuse the culture and language of Black, Indigenous, and People of Color communities who have been and continue to be harmed and erased through the education system. (h) "Institutional racism" means structures, policies, and practices within and across institutions that produce outcomes that disadvantage those who are Black, Indigenous, and People of Color. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.045, is amended to read: 123B.045 DISTRICT-CREATED SITE-GOVERNED SCHOOLS. Subdivision 1. Authority. (a) A school board may approve site-governed schools under this section deleted text begin by requesting site-governing school proposals. The request for proposals must include what types of schools or education innovations the board intends to create.deleted text end new text begin after reviewing a proposal that includes a site-governed school's agreement and a proposed memorandum of understanding, if applicable. A proposal is approved when the board enters into a site-governed school agreement under paragraph (c) and a memorandum of understanding under paragraph (b), if applicable. A proposal for a site-governed school at a site that does not have a site council must identify the proposed site council members authorized to enter into the site-governed school agreement with the board, consistent with the requirements for site council members under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (1).new text end A current site may submit a proposal deleted text begin to create a different model for the sitedeleted text end if 60 percent or more of the teachers at the site support the proposal. A group of licensed district professionals from one or multiple district sites may submit a proposal. The group submitting the proposal must include parents or other community members in the development of the proposal. deleted text begin A proposal may request approval for a model of a school not included in the request for proposal of the board.deleted text end new text begin Within 90 days of receiving a proposal, the school board must determine whether to approve, deny, or return the proposal to the site for further information or development.new text end (b) The school board and the applicable bargaining unit representing district employees must enter into memoranda of understanding specifying how applicable sections of current contracts will enable the provisions of subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (7) and (8), to be implementednew text begin , if applicablenew text end . deleted text begin (c) Within 60 days of receipt of the application, the school board shall determine whether to approve, deny, or return the application to the applicants for further information or development. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) Upon approval of the proposal,deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end An agreement between the district and deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin one or morenew text end site deleted text begin council shall be developed identifying the powers and duties delegated to the site and outlining the details of the proposal including the provisions of subdivisions 2, 3, and 5.deleted text end new text begin councils must:new text end new text begin (1) identify the autonomies and responsibilities delegated to the school site, in addition to the autonomies and responsibilities assigned to the school site under subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) identify the specific services provided by the district for the site under subdivision 3, and the district's expectations in supporting the school site; new text end new text begin (3) identify any administrative fees due to the district under subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (4) define clear performance expectations for the school site consistent with subdivision 5; and new text end new text begin (5) provide clear reporting and dispute resolution mechanisms. new text end new text begin (d) A community nonprofit organization supporting an effective partnership between the district and site council may be a party to the agreement. new text end new text begin (e)new text end Any powers or duties not specifically delegated to the school site in the agreement remains with the school board. new text begin (f) An initial agreement between the district and site council must have a term of three years. If the school site substantially meets specified performance expectations, the agreement is automatically renewed for five years. new text end new text begin (g) The parties to a site-governed school agreement have all available remedies at law and equity in addition to the rights and remedies contained in this section. new text end Subd. 2. Roles and responsibilities of site-governed schools. (a) Site-governed schools approved by the school board have the following autonomy and responsibilities at the discretion of the site: (1) to create the site-governing council of the school. The council shall include teachers new text begin including a designee of the exclusive representative of teachersnew text end , administratorsnew text begin including the principalnew text end , parents, students if appropriate, community members, and other representatives of the community as determined by the site-governing council. Teachers may comprise a majority of the site-governing council at the option of a majority of the teachers at the site. The number of members on the site-governing councilnew text begin , the manner in which members are selected,new text end and the composition shall be included in the deleted text begin proposaldeleted text end new text begin agreementnew text end approved by the school board; (2) to determine the leadership model for the site including: selecting a principal, operating as a teacher professional practices model with school leadership functions performed by one or more teachers or administrators at the school or other model determined by the site; (3) to determine the budget for the site and the allocation and expenditure of the revenue based on provisions of subdivision 3; (4) to determine the learning model and organization of the school consistent with the application approved by the school board; (5) to select and develop its curriculum and determine formative and summative assessment practices; (6) to set policies for the site including student promotion, attendance, discipline, graduation requirements which may exceed the school board standards, and other such rules as approved by the school board consistent with the mission, goals, and learning program of the school site; (7) to determine the length of the school day and year and employee work rules covered by the terms and conditions of the employment contract; (8) to select teachers and other staff consistent with current law and collective bargaining agreements and memoranda of understanding provided for in subdivision 1, paragraph (b). deleted text begin At least 70 percent of the teachers must be selected by the site prior to final approval of the agreement. Prior to requesting the district to employ staff not currently employed by the district, the site must first select current district staff including those on requested and unrequested leave as provided for indeleted text end new text begin A school board may not involuntarily assign a district employee to work at a site-governed school. The selection process for staff on requested and unrequested leave of absence undernew text end sections 122A.40 and 122A.41new text begin applies to site-governed schools to the same extent as other schools in the districtnew text end . The school board shall be the legal employer of all staff at the site and all teachers and other staff members of the applicable bargaining units. Teachers and other employees may be required to sign an individual work agreement with the site-governing council committing themselves to the mission and learning program of the school and the requirements of the site-governing council; and (9) to fulfill other provisions as agreed to by the district and site-governing council. (b) If a self-governed school created under this section is supervised by a principal, that principal must be licensed, consistent with section 123B.147, subdivision 2. Subd. 2a. Teacher-governed schools; grants. (a) Consistent with subdivision 1 authorizing a school board to agree to assign certain autonomies and responsibilities to a school site, and subject to a memorandum of understanding between the school board and the exclusive representative of the teachers, a grant program is established to encourage licensed teachers employed at a school site to explore and develop organizational models for teaching and learning; provide curriculum and corresponding formative, interim, and summative assessments; measure and evaluate teacher performance; assign teaching positions and restructure instructional work; provide professional development to support teachers restructuring their work; allocate revenue; assert autonomy and leadership; and pursue other such policies, strategies, and activities for creating teacher-governed schools. (b) The commissioner, after receiving documentation of the approved agreement between the parties under subdivision 1, paragraph deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end , shall award grants on a first-come, first-served basis until appropriated funds are expended according to this paragraph: (1) a planning grant of up to $50,000 during the first year of the parties' agreement; and (2) an implementation grant of up to $100,000 during each of the next two years of the parties' agreement. (c) A grant recipient that terminates an agreement before the end of a school year must return a pro rata portion of the grant to the commissioner, the amount of which the commissioner must determine based upon the number of school days remaining in the school year after the agreement is terminated. Grant recipients are encouraged to seek matching funds or in-kind contributions from nonstate sources to supplement the grant awards. (d) A school district receiving a grant must transmit to the commissioner in an electronic format and post on its website by the end of the school year readily accessible information about recommended best practices based on its experience and progress under this section. The commissioner must make information about these recommended best practices readily available to interested districts and schools throughout Minnesota. Subd. 3. Revenue to self-governed school. (a) The revenue that shall be allocated by the site includes the general education revenue generated by the students at the site from state, local, and private sources, referendum revenue, federal revenue from the Elementary and Secondary Education Act, Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, Carl Perkins Act, and other federal programs deleted text begin as agreed to bydeleted text end new text begin in accordance with the agreement betweennew text end the school board and site council. (b) The district may retain an administrative fee for managing the federal programs, private revenues, and general administrative functions including school board, superintendent, district legal counsel, finance, accountability and self-governed school contract oversight, facilities maintenance, districtwide special education programs, and other such services deleted text begin as agreed to bydeleted text end new text begin in accordance with the agreement betweennew text end the sitenew text begin councilnew text end and school board. deleted text begin The administrative fee shall be included in the agreement.deleted text end (c) As part of the agreement, the district may provide specific services for the site and may specify the amount to be paid for each service and retain the revenues for that amount. The formula or procedures for determining the amount of revenue to be allocated to the site each year shall be consistent with this subdivision and incorporated in the site budget annually following a timeline and process that is included in the agreement with the school board. The site is responsible for allocating revenue for all staff at the site and for the other provisions of the agreement with the district board. (d) All unspent revenue shall be carried over to following years for the sole use of the site. Subd. 4. Exemption from statutes and rules. Except as outlined in this section, site-governed schools established under this section are exempt from and subject to the same laws and rules as are chartered schools under chapter 124E, except that the schools shall be subject to chapters 13, 13D, and 179A, and sections 122A.40, 122A.41, 122A.50, and 122A.51. Subd. 5. Performance standards. (a) The school board and the deleted text begin sitedeleted text end new text begin site-governingnew text end council shall include in the agreement performance standards and expectations that shall include at least the following: (1) student achievement targets on multiple indicators including either a growth model or value-added growth model; (2) the criteria and process to be followed if it is determined that the site failed to comply with district oversight and accountability requirements as outlined in the agreement; and (3) other performance provisions as agreed to. (b) All agreements shall be filed with the commissioner. deleted text begin The initial agreement shall be for up to three years, shall be reviewed annually, and may be renewed by the district board for additional terms of up to five years based on the performance of the school.deleted text end Subd. 6. Board termination of self-governed school authority. (a) The district board may terminate the agreement for new text begin only new text end one or more of the following reasons: (1) failure of the site to meet the provisions specified in the agreement in subdivision 5new text begin following at least two full school years of the school operating under the agreementnew text end ; (2) violations of law; or (3) deleted text begin other good cause showndeleted text end new text begin imminent risk of irreparable harm to students at the schoolnew text end . (b) Site-governed schools that are terminated or not renewed deleted text begin for reasons other than causedeleted text end may request to convert to charter school status as provided for in chapter 124E and, if chartered by the board, shall become the owner of all materials, supplies, and equipment purchased during the period the school was a site-governed school. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124D.09, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Authorization; notification. (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an 11th or 12th grade pupil enrolled in a school district, a charter school, or an American Indian-controlled Tribal contract or grant school eligible for aid under section 124D.83, except a foreign exchange pupil enrolled in a district under a cultural exchange program, may apply to an eligible institution, as defined in subdivision 3, to enroll in nonsectarian courses offered by that postsecondary institution.new text begin The provisions in this section, including approved admissions standards submitted by an eligible institution, are the only criteria upon which a pupil described in this subdivision may not be permitted to participate in a course offered by an eligible institution.new text end (b) If an new text begin eligible new text end institution accepts a secondary pupil for enrollment under this section, the new text begin eligible new text end institution shall send written notice to the pupil, the pupil's school or school district, and the commissioner. The notice must indicate the course and hours of enrollment of that pupil. The new text begin eligible new text end institution must notify the pupil's school as soon as practicable if the pupil withdraws from the enrolled course. The new text begin eligible new text end institution must also notify the pupil's school as soon as practicable if the pupil has been absent from a course for ten consecutive days on which classes are held, based upon the postsecondary institution's academic calendar, and the pupil is not receiving instruction in their home or hospital or other facility. (c) If the pupil enrolls in a course for postsecondary credit, the new text begin eligible new text end institution must notifydeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end the pupil about payment in the customary manner used by the new text begin eligible new text end institutiondeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end deleted text begin (2) the pupil's school as soon as practicable if the pupil withdraws from the course or stops attending the coursedeleted text end . Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124D.09, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Dissemination of information; notification of intent to enroll. By the earlier of (1) three weeks prior to the date by which a student must register for school district, charter school, or Tribal contract school courses for the following school year, or (2) March 1 of each year, a school district, charter school, or Tribal contract school must provide up-to-date information on the school district's, charter school's, or Tribal contract school's website and in materials that are distributed to parents and students about the program, including information about enrollment requirements and the ability to earn postsecondary credit to all pupils in grades 8, 9, 10, and 11. To assist the school district, charter school, or Tribal contract school in planning, new text begin by May 30 of each year, new text end a pupil must deleted text begin informdeleted text end new text begin notifynew text end the school district, charter school, or Tribal contract school deleted text begin by October 30 or May 30 of each year of the pupil's intent to enroll in postsecondary courses during the following academic term. A pupil is bound by notifying or not notifying the school district, charter school, or Tribal contract school by October 30 or May 30deleted text end new text begin of the pupil's intent to enroll in courses during the subsequent school year. If a pupil does not provide notice by May 30, and does not participate in a postsecondary course during the fall term, the pupil must provide notice by October 30 to participate in a postsecondary course during the spring term of the same academic year. A pupil's enrollment notification is required once each academic yearnew text end . Sec. 8. new text begin [127A.135] HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA FOR VETERANS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Diploma. new text end new text begin A school district or charter school must, upon a request under subdivision 2, issue a high school diploma to a veteran as defined in section 197.447 who was unable to complete their high school education for reasons related or unrelated to their military service, and who served: new text end new text begin (1) during the Korean Conflict from June 27, 1950, to January 31, 1955; or new text end new text begin (2) during the Vietnam War, either in the country from November 1, 1955, to May 7, 1975, or outside of the country from August 5, 1964, to May 7, 1975. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Request. new text end new text begin A veteran may request a diploma on their own behalf, or a family member may make a posthumous request on behalf of a deceased veteran or service member. The high school diploma is awarded based on the veteran's knowledge and experience gained while in service, or the veteran's other relevant lived experience. The school district or charter school may require the veteran or veteran's requestor to provide evidence that the veteran was a Minnesota public school student or is a current Minnesota resident. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin No report required. new text end new text begin Districts and charter schools are not required to report on diplomas issued under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Assistance. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Department of Veterans Affairs and county veteran service officers may provide assistance to districts and charter schools fulfilling these requests, including but not limited to verification of discharge paperwork. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin MINNESOTA CIVIC SEAL COUNCIL FIRST APPOINTMENTS AND MEETING.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin First appointments. new text end new text begin Appointing authorities must appoint members to the Minnesota Civic Seal Council by August 15, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin First meeting. new text end new text begin The secretary of state or a designee must convene the first meeting of the Minnesota Civic Seal Council by September 15, 2026. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin CURSIVE HANDWRITING.new text end new text begin In the next review and revision of the language arts academic standards under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.021, subdivision 4, the commissioner must include expectations for learning to read and write cursive. new text end ARTICLE 3 THE READ ACT Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.119, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Literacy specialist. "Literacy specialist" means a person licensed by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board deleted text begin as a teacher of reading, a special education teacher, or a kindergarten through grade 6 teacher,deleted text end who has completed professional development approved by the Department of Education in structured literacy. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.119, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10a. new text end new text begin Parent. new text end new text begin "Parent" means a student's parent or legal guardian. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Literacy goal. (a) The legislature seeks to have every child reading at or above grade level every year, beginning in kindergarten, and to support multilingual learners and students receiving special education services in achieving their individualized reading goals in order to meet grade-level benchmarks. By the 2026-2027 school year, districts must provide evidence-based reading instruction through a focus on student mastery of the foundational reading skills of phonemic awareness, phonics, and fluency, as well as the development of oral language, vocabulary, and reading comprehension skills. Students must receive evidence-based instruction that is proven to effectively teach children to read, consistent with sections 120B.118 to 120B.124. (b) To meet this goal, each district must provide teachers and instructional support staff with responsibility for teaching reading new text begin and licensed library media specialists new text end with training on evidence-based reading instruction that is approved by the Department of Education by the deadlines provided in section 120B.123, subdivision 5. (c) Districts are strongly encouraged to adopt a MTSS framework. The framework should include a process for engaging families and communities, monitoring student progress, evaluating program fidelity, and analyzing student outcomes and needs in order to design and implement ongoing evidenced-based, culturally responsive instruction and interventions. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.12, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Identification; report. (a) Each school district must screen every student enrolled in kindergarten, grade 1, grade 2, and grade 3 using a screening tool approved by the Department of Education three times each school year: (1) within the first six weeks of the school year; (2) by February 15 each year; and (3) within the last six weeks of the school year. Students enrolled in kindergarten, grade 1, grade 2, and grade 3, including multilingual learners, students receiving special education services, and students enrolled in dual language immersion programs, must be universally screened for mastery of foundational reading skills, including phonemic awareness, phonics, decoding, fluency, oral language, and for characteristics of dyslexia as measured by a screening tool approved by the Department of Education. The screening for characteristics of dyslexia may be integrated with universal screening for mastery of foundational skills and expressive or receptive language mastery. deleted text begin The screening tool used must be a valid and reliable universal screener that is highly correlated with foundational reading skills. For students reading at grade level, beginning in the winter of grade 2, the oral reading fluency screener may be used to assess reading difficulties, including characteristics of dyslexia, without requiring a separate screening of each subcomponent of foundational reading skills.deleted text end A district must submit data on student performance in kindergarten, grade 1, grade 2, and grade 3 on foundational reading skills, including phonemic awareness, phonics, decoding, fluency, and oral language to the Department of Education in the annual local literacy plan submission due on June 15.new text begin A parent, in consultation with a teacher, may opt a student out of the literacy screener if the parent and teacher decide that continuing to screen would not be beneficial to the student. In these limited cases, the student must continue to receive progress monitoring and literacy interventions.new text end (b) For students enrolled in dual language immersion programs: (1) if students are screened in the partner language, they must be screened at the same interval as the screenings in English under paragraph (a); (2) if the program provides instruction in foundational reading skills in English, the students receiving that instruction must be screened in English; (3) if the program provides instruction in foundational reading skills in the partner language, the students receiving that instruction must be screened in the partner language; (4) if no screener is available in the partner language, the districts must identify how students' reading proficiency is assessed and how the districts determine and provide targeted reading instruction in the partner language and supports to students identified as needing additional support in developing mastery of foundational reading skills; and (5) the partner language screening tool must be approved by the district for kindergarten through grade 3 students. (c) Students in grades 4 and above, including multilingual learners and students receiving special education services, who are not reading at grade level must be screened for reading difficulties, including characteristics of dyslexia, using a screening tool approved by the Department of Education, and must continue to receive evidence-based instruction, interventions, and progress monitoring until the students achieve grade-level proficiency. A parent, in consultation with a teacher, may opt a student out of the literacy screener if the parent and teacher decide that continuing to screen would not be beneficial to the student. In such limited cases, the student must continue to receive progress monitoring and literacy interventions. (d) Reading screeners in English, and in the predominant languages of district students where practicable, must identify and evaluate students' areas of academic need related to literacy. The district also must monitor the progress and provide reading instruction appropriate to the specific needs of multilingual learners. The district must use an approved, developmentally appropriate, and culturally responsive screener and annually report summary screener results to the commissioner by June 15 in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. new text begin (e) An English language learner must be screened for characteristics of dyslexia according to the vendor's assessment guidelines. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The district also must include in its local literacy plan under subdivision 4a, a summary of the district's efforts to screen, identify, and provide interventions to students who demonstrate characteristics of dyslexia as measured by a screening tool approved by the Department of Education. Districts are strongly encouraged to use a MTSS framework. With respect to students screened or identified under paragraph (a), the report must include: (1) a summary of the district's efforts to screen for characteristics of reading difficulties, including dyslexia; (2) the number of students universally screened for that reporting year; (3) the number of students demonstrating characteristics of dyslexia for that year; and (4) an explanation of how students identified under this subdivision are provided with alternate instruction and interventions under section 125A.56, subdivision 1. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.12, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Parent notification and involvement. (a) A district must administer an approved reading screener to students in kindergarten through grade 3 within the first six weeks of the school year, by February 15 each year, and again within the last six weeks of the school year.new text begin A district must administer an approved reading screener to students in grades 4 through 12 who are not reading at grade level at least once per year until the student reaches grade-level proficiency.new text end Schools, after administering each screener, must follow the language access plan under section 123B.32 and give the parent of each student who is not reading at or above grade level information from the screener about: (1) the student's reading proficiency as measured by a screener approved by the Department of Education; (2) reading-related services currently being provided to the student and the student's progress; and (3) strategies for parents to use at home in helping their student succeed in becoming grade-level proficient in reading in English and in their native language. (b) For students enrolled in dual language immersion programs, the district must measure the student's reading proficiency in English or in the program's partner language, if available, according to subdivision 2. Following the district's language access plan under section 123B.32, the district must notify families with timely information about students' reading proficiency, including how the student's reading proficiency is assessed, any reading-related services or supports provided to the student and the student's progress, and strategies for families to use at home in helping students succeed in becoming grade-level proficient in reading in English or the partner language. The dual language immersion program may provide information about national research on reading proficiency for students in dual language immersion programs in the parent notification. (c) A district may not use this section to deny a student's right to a special education evaluation. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.12, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Staff development. (a) A district must provide training on evidence-based structured literacy instruction to teachers and instructional staff in accordance with subdivision 1, paragraphs (b) and (c). The training must include teaching in the areas of phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary development, reading fluency, reading comprehension, and culturally and linguistically responsive pedagogy. (b) Each district shall use the data under subdivision 2 to identify the staff development needs so that: (1) elementary teachers are able to implement explicit, systematic, evidence-based instruction in the five reading areas of phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension with emphasis on mastery of foundational reading skills as defined in section 120B.119 and other literacy-related areas including writing until the student achieves grade-level reading and writing proficiency; (2) elementary teachers receive training to provide students with evidence-based reading and oral language instruction that meets students' developmental, linguistic, and literacy needs using the intervention methods or programs selected by the district for the identified students; (3) licensed teachers employed by the district have opportunities to improve reading and writing instruction through approved professional development identified in the local literacy plan; (4) licensed teachers recognize students' diverse needs in cross-cultural settings and are able to serve the oral language and linguistic needs of students who are multilingual learners by maximizing strengths in their native languages in order to cultivate students' English language development, including academic language development, and build academic literacy; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) licensed teachers are trained in culturally responsive pedagogy that enables students to master content, develop skills to access content, and build relationshipsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) licensed library media specialists employed by the district have sufficient training to select appropriate materials to supplement classroom reading and writing instruction and to serve the literacy needs of students. new text end (c) A district that offers early childhood programs, including voluntary prekindergarten for eligible four-year-old children, early childhood special education, and school readiness programs, must provide classroom teachers in early childhood programs training approved by the Department of Education to provide children in early childhood programs with explicit, systematic instruction in phonological and phonemic awareness; oral language, including listening comprehension; vocabulary; and letter-sound correspondence. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.12, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Local literacy plan. (a) Consistent with this section, a school district must adopt a local literacy plan to have every child reading at or above grade level every year beginning in kindergarten and to support multilingual learners and students receiving special education services in achieving their individualized reading goals. A district must update and submit the plan to the commissioner by June 15 each year. The plan must be consistent with the Read Act, and include the following: (1) a process to assess students' foundational reading skills, oral language, and level of reading proficiency and the approved screeners used, by school site and grade level, under section 120B.123; (2) a process to notify and involve parents; (3) a description of how schools in the district will determine the targeted reading instruction that is evidence-based and includes an intervention strategy for a student and the process for intensifying or modifying the reading strategy in order to obtain measurable reading progress; (4) evidence-based intervention methods for students who are not reading at or above grade level and progress monitoring to provide information on the effectiveness of the intervention; (5) identification of staff development needs, including a plan to meet those needs; (6) the curricula used by school site and grade level and, if applicable, the district plan and timeline for adopting evidence-based curricula and materials starting in the 2025-2026 school year; (7) a statement of whether the district has adopted a MTSS framework; (8) student data using the measures of foundational literacy skills and mastery identified by the Department of Education for the following students: (i) students in kindergarten through grade 3; (ii) students who demonstrate characteristics of dyslexia; and (iii) students in grades 4 to 12 who are identified as not reading at grade level; (9) the number of teachers and other staff who have completed training approved by the department; (10) the number of teachers and other staff proposed for training in structured literacy; (11) how the district used funding provided under the Read Act to implement the requirements of the Read Act; (12) beginning as soon as practicable after the end of fiscal year 2026, how the district used literacy aid funding received under section 124D.98; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (13) beginning on December 31, 2025, for a district with a dual language immersion program: (i) the program's partner language; (ii) grade levels included in the program; (iii) the language used to screen students' foundational reading skills; (iv) the percentage of grade 3 students taking the Minnesota Comprehensive Assessments; and (v) the number of students in the program in grades 4 to 12 who are identified as not reading at grade leveldeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (14) a description of how schools in the district will use the school library media center to complement students' foundational reading skills with the guidance of a licensed library media specialist. new text end (b) Annually by June 15, the district must post its literacy plan on the official school district website and submit it to the commissioner of education using the template developed by the commissioner of education. (c) Districts must use a streamlined template developed by the commissioner of education for local literacy plans that meets the requirements of this subdivision and requires all reading instruction and teacher training in reading instruction to be evidence-based. The template must require a district to report information using the student categories required in the commissioner's report under paragraph (d). The template must focus district resources on improving students' foundational reading skills while reducing paperwork requirements for teachers. (d) By December 1, 2025, the commissioner of education must submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over prekindergarten through grade 12 education summarizing the local literacy plans submitted to the commissioner. The summary must include the following information: (1) the number of teachers and other staff, by grade level, who have completed training approved by the Department of Education; (2) the number of teachers and other staff, by grade level, required to complete the training under section 120B.123, subdivision 5, who have not completed the training; (3) the number of teachers exempt under section 120B.123, subdivision 5, from completing training approved by the Department of Education; (4) the statewide total number of teachers or other staff required to complete the training under section 120B.123, subdivision 5, that have received other training or education that meets the requirements of the training approved by the Department of Education; (5) by school site and grade, the approved screeners and the reading curriculum used; (6) by school site and grade, using the measurements of foundational literacy skills and mastery identified by the department, both aggregated data and disaggregated data on student performance on the approved screeners using the student categories under section 120B.35, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (2); and (7) information about dual language immersion programs. (e) By December 1, 2026, and December 1, 2027, the commissioner of education must submit updated reports containing the information required under paragraph (d) and updates and recommendations from the dual language immersion advisory committee established under subdivision 6, to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over prekindergarten through grade 12 education. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.123, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Approved screeners. (a) A district must administer an approved evidence-based reading screener to students in kindergarten through grade 3 within the first six weeks of the school year, by February 15 each year, and again within the last six weeks of the school year. new text begin A district must provide vendor-approved screening accommodations to students with documented accommodation plans.new text end The screener must be one of the screening tools approved by the Department of Education. A district must identify any screener it uses in the district's annual literacy plan, and submit screening data with the annual literacy plan by June 15. (b) Starting in the 2024-2025 school year, district staff and external partners offering literacy supports in schools may only use screeners that have been approved by the Department of Education. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.123, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Professional development. (a) A district must provide training from a menu of approved evidence-based training programs to the following teachers and staff by July 1, 2026: (1) reading intervention teachers working with students in kindergarten through grade 12; (2) all classroom teachers of students in kindergarten through grade 3 and children in prekindergarten programs; (3) kindergarten through grade 12 special education teachers responsible for foundational reading instruction; (4) curriculum directors; (5) instructional support staff, contractors, and volunteers who assist in providing reading interventions under the oversight and monitoring of a trained licensed teacher; (6) employees who select literacy instructional materials for a district; and (7) teachers holding English as a second language teaching licenses. (b) A district must provide training from a menu of approved evidence-based training programs to the following teachers by July 1, 2027: (1) teachers who provide foundational reading instruction to students in grades 4 to 12; (2) teachers who provide instruction to students in a state-approved alternative program; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) teachers who provide instruction to students in dual language immersion programsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) licensed library media specialists. new text end (c) The commissioner of education may grant a district an extension to the deadlines in this subdivision. (d) Training provided by the following may satisfy the professional development requirements under this subdivision: (1) a certified trained facilitator; or (2) a training program that the department has determined meets the professional development requirements under the Read Act. (e) Beginning July 1, 2027, an educator required to receive training under paragraph (a), who is new to the state of Minnesota or is a newly licensed teacher who did not receive instruction in the teaching of foundational reading skills based on structured literacy, must complete one of the approved required trainings. Training must be offered through the regional literacy network and facilitated by a local certified trained facilitator. The Department of Education must review district literacy lead waiver requests and grant waivers to educators new to the state or educators who provide reading instruction exclusively using alternatives to sound-based approaches, and who have completed the professional development requirements consistent with this subdivision. (f) For the 2024-2025 deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end 2025-2026new text begin , and 2026-2027new text end school years only, the hours of instruction requirement under section 120A.41 for students in elementary and secondary school, as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9 and 13, is reduced by 5-1/2 hours for a district that enters into an agreement with the exclusive representative of the teachers that requires teachers to receive at least 5-1/2 hours of approved evidence-based training required under this subdivision, on a day when other students in the district receive instruction. If a charter school's teachers are not represented by an exclusive representative, the charter school may reduce the number of instructional hours for students in elementary and secondary school, as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9 and 13, by 5-1/2 hours after consulting with its teachers in order to provide teachers with at least 5-1/2 hours of evidence-based training required under this subdivision on a day when other students receive instruction. The hours of instruction reduction for secondary school students is applicable only for the 2025-2026new text begin and 2026-2027new text end school deleted text begin yeardeleted text end new text begin yearsnew text end . new text begin (g) An educator who was enrolled in an elementary, special education or early childhood education Minnesota-approved teacher preparation program on or after June 1, 2026, does not need to receive additional training according to paragraph (a). new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.123, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Accessibility standards. new text end new text begin (a) All professional development and digital curriculum resources must comply with the accessibility standards developed according to section 16E.03, subdivision 9. new text end new text begin (b) Professional development provided in accordance with the Read Act is subject to the requirements of section 363A.43. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.124, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin (a) The curricula and supporting materials identified according to subdivision 1 or through the ongoing review of literacy materials in subdivision 5 must be categorized as highly aligned, partially aligned, minimally aligned, or not aligned to evidence-based structural literacy practices. For the purposes of this section, the review resource categories are defined as follows: new text end new text begin (1) "highly aligned" means 100 percent of domains were at or above the cut point with no significant red flags identified for the program. Curriculum and intervention materials that are not reviewed do not meet criteria for Tier 1 interventions and must not be categorized as highly aligned; new text end new text begin (2) "partially aligned" means 60 to 99 percent of domains were at or above the cut point; new text end new text begin (3) "minimally aligned" means 34 to 59 percent of domains were at or above the cut point; and new text end new text begin (4) "not aligned" means 33 percent or less of domains were at or above the cut point. new text end new text begin (b) When planning for curriculum implementation, it is a district's responsibility to verify that curriculum and intervention materials align with evidence-based structured literacy practices. A district must resolve any issues identified by the department in the review of materials using the Read Act rubric and report of reviewed resources. new text end new text begin (c) A district must ensure that any red flags for a program are resolved through district enhancements to the selected program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.124, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Ongoing review of literacy materials. new text begin (a) By October 1, 2026, the department must establish an ongoing review process in order to identify curriculum and intervention materials that are evidence-based, focused on structural literacy, culturally and linguistically responsive, and reflective of diverse populations. new text end The department may partner with one or more institutions of higher education new text begin or a third party new text end to conduct independent and objective reviews of curriculum and intervention materials. The department must determine whether it will partner with an institution of higher education new text begin or a third party new text end to conduct ongoing reviews of literacy materials by deleted text begin Junedeleted text end new text begin Octobernew text end 1, 2026. A publisher may submit curriculum or intervention materials for review. The publisher is responsible for paying the cost of the review directly to deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin a partnering new text end institution of higher educationnew text begin or third partynew text end . The review must use the new text begin Read Act new text end rubric used to approve curriculum deleted text begin and postdeleted text end new text begin . The department may modify the Read Act rubric to reflect the changing needs of grade levels and special populations, including the Minnesota English Language Arts standards, culturally and linguistically responsive criteria, and criteria reflective of diverse populations.new text end The new text begin Read Act new text end rubric new text begin must be posted new text end on the department website. The department and deleted text begin institution of higher educationdeleted text end new text begin its partnernew text end may approve the curriculum or intervention materials if they determine that the curriculum or intervention materials are evidence-based, focused on structured literacy, culturally and linguistically responsive, and reflect diverse populations. The department must add the approved curriculum or intervention materials to the list of curricula and materials approved under the Read Act.new text begin Following each review cycle, the department must post the findings of the curriculum and intervention materials review on the department website. Alternative curriculum and intervention programs for those who cannot access sound-based approaches must be reviewed on the same review cycle as traditional programs.new text end new text begin (b) A program undergoing a full review cycle must be added to the reviewed curricula and intervention program list after the review process is completed. new text end new text begin (c) Resources that are categorized as minimally aligned or not aligned to evidence-based structural literacy practices do not qualify for use of literacy aid under section 124D.98 or state funding provided under the Read Act. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.124, subdivision 6, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end ARTICLE 4 TEACHERS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.363, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Rulemaking. The deleted text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must adopt rules to implement a statewide credential for education paraprofessionals who assist a licensed teacher in providing student instruction. Any paraprofessional holding this credential or working in a local school district after meeting a state-approved local assessment is considered to be highly qualified under federal law. Under this subdivision, deleted text begin the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board, in consultation withdeleted text end the commissionerdeleted text begin ,deleted text end must adopt qualitative criteria for approving local assessments that include an evaluation of a paraprofessional's knowledge of reading, writing, and math and the paraprofessional's ability to assist in the instruction of reading, writing, and math. The commissioner must approve or disapprove local assessments using these criteria. The commissioner must make the criteria available to the public. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.363, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Training possibilities. In adopting rules under subdivision 1, the deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must consider including provisions that provide training in: students' characteristics; teaching and learning environment; academic instruction skills; student behavior; and ethical practices. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 121A.642, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Qualifications. (a) Starting in the 2025-2026 school year, a paraprofessional meets the federal personnel qualifications required in Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 300.156, if the paraprofessional: (1) has at least two years of college credits through an accredited institution of higher education, or an associate's degree or higher; (2) has received a passing score on an assessment approved by the Department of Education; or (3) demonstrates the following competencies, regardless of the number of hours of training the paraprofessional has received: (i) understanding the distinctions between roles and responsibilities of professionals, paraprofessionals, and support personnel; (ii) understanding the purposes and goals of education and instruction for all students; (iii) knowledge of relevant laws, rules, regulations, and local district policies and procedures to ensure paraprofessionals work within these parameters; (iv) awareness of the challenges and expectations of various learning environments; (v) the ability to establish and maintain rapport with students; (vi) the ability to follow oral and written direction of licensed teachers, seeking clarification as needed; (vii) the ability to assist and reinforce elements that support a safe, healthy, and effective teaching and learning environment; (viii) understanding strategies for assisting with the inclusion of students in various settings; (ix) the ability to use strategies that promote the student's independence; (x) understanding applicable laws, rules, and regulations, and procedural safeguards regarding the management of student behaviors; (xi) awareness of the primary factors that influence student behavior; (xii) the ability to effectively employ a variety of strategies that reinforce positive behavior; (xiii) the ability to use ethical practices for confidential communication about students; (xiv) the ability to follow teacher instructions while conferring and collaborating with teachers about student schedules, instructional goals, and performance; (xv) demonstrating a commitment to assisting students in reaching the students' highest potential, including the modeling of positive behavior; (xvi) showing respect for the diversity of students; (xvii) showing a willingness to participate in ongoing staff development and self-evaluation and to apply constructive feedback; (xviii) supporting and reinforcing the instruction of students in mathematics following written and oral lesson plans developed by licensed teachers; (xix) supporting and reinforcing the instruction of students in reading following written and oral lesson plans developed by licensed teachers. Professional development required under the Read Act in section 120B.123 exceeds this requirement; and (xx) supporting and reinforcing the instruction of students in writing following written and oral lesson plans developed by licensed teachers. (b) Starting in the 2025-2026 school year, a paraprofessional meets the federal personnel qualifications required in Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 200.58, if the paraprofessional: (1) has at least two years of college credits from an accredited institution of higher education, or an associate's degree or higher; or (2) met a rigorous standard of quality and can demonstrate, through a formal state or local academic assessment, knowledge of and the ability to assist in instructing, as appropriate: (i) reading or language arts, writing, and mathematics; or (ii) reading readiness, writing readiness, and mathematics readiness. (c) Upon request from a paraprofessional employed by a school district, charter school, or cooperative unit providing direct instructional services, the school district, charter school, or cooperative unit may provide administrative assistance to the paraprofessional when completing requirements related to the competencies required under this subdivision. new text begin (d) A paraprofessional who demonstrates the competencies listed in paragraph (a), clause (3), must be deemed to have obtained a passing score on a formal state or local academic assessment in accordance with paragraph (a), clause (2). The department must take any steps necessary to ensure the paraprofessional meets federal qualification requirements, including but not limited to applying for a waiver under Code of Federal Regulations, title 20, section 5891b. A district or charter school must maintain the paraprofessional's completed assessment and documentation that the paraprofessional demonstrated the required competencies in the paraprofessional's personnel file. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.09, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules subject to the provisions of chapter 14 to implement sections deleted text begin 120B.363,deleted text end 122A.05 to 122A.09, 122A.092, 122A.16, 122A.17, 122A.18, 122A.181, 122A.182, 122A.183, 122A.184, 122A.185, 122A.187, 122A.188, 122A.19, 122A.20, 122A.21, 122A.23, 122A.26, 122A.28, 122A.29, and 124D.72. (b) The board must adopt rules relating to fields of licensure and grade levels that a licensed teacher may teach, including a process for granting permission to a licensed teacher to teach in a field that is different from the teacher's field of licensure without change to the teacher's license tier level. (c) If a rule adopted by the board is in conflict with a session law or statute, the law or statute prevails. Terms adopted in rule must be clearly defined and must not be construed to conflict with terms adopted in statute or session law. (d) The board must include a description of a proposed rule's probable effect on teacher supply and demand in the board's statement of need and reasonableness under section 14.131. (e) The board must adopt rules only under the specific statutory authority. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.092, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Early literacy field experience. new text end new text begin (a) A teacher preparation provider approved by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board to prepare teacher candidates to provide instruction in early literacy must require a supervised early literacy field experience aligned to evidence-based best practices in reading consistent with sections 120B.118 to 120B.124. The early literacy field experience requirement applies to teacher candidates who enroll in teacher preparation programs in the 2027-2028 school year or later. new text end new text begin (b) The early literacy field experience must be integrated with learning experiences in reading instruction, including instruction on reading methods or equivalent, and must provide teacher candidates with opportunities to apply evidence-based literacy practices with students. new text end new text begin (c) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules regarding the early literacy field experience requirement, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) defining licensure areas in which teacher candidates must complete the early literacy field experience; new text end new text begin (2) establishing expectations for the scope and outcomes of the early literacy field experience; new text end new text begin (3) ensuring the field experience occurs primarily within a school building during the instructional day, while allowing for waivers when appropriate to accommodate unique program delivery models or documented hardship; and new text end new text begin (4) requiring the field experience to include observation with actionable feedback to ensure growth and attainment of related reading standards. new text end new text begin (d) In adopting rules under this subdivision, the board must allow flexibility for teacher preparation programs to demonstrate that candidates have met required standards through field experiences. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.16, is amended to read: 122A.16 QUALIFIED TEACHER DEFINED. A qualified teacher is one holding a valid license, under this chapter, to perform the particular service for which the teacher is employed in a public school.new text begin A qualified teacher is not an artificial intelligence model and it must not perform the service for which a teacher is employed in a public school. This does not preclude a licensed teacher from using an artificial intelligence model as a tool to assist them in performing their services. For the purposes of this section, "artificial intelligence model" means a machine-based system that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 122A.18, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority to license. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must issue the following teacher licenses to applicants who meet the qualifications prescribed by this chapter: (1) Tier 1 license under section 122A.181; (2) Tier 2 license under section 122A.182; (3) Tier 3 license under section 122A.183; and (4) Tier 4 license under section 122A.184. (b) The Board of School Administrators must license supervisory personnel as defined in section 122A.15, subdivision 2, except for athletic coaches. (c) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board and the Department of Education must enter into a data sharing agreement to share: (1) educational data at the E-12 level for the limited purpose of program approval and improvement for teacher education programs. The program approval process must include targeted redesign of teacher preparation programs to address identified E-12 student areas of concern; and (2) data in the staff automated reporting system for the limited purpose of managing and processing funding to school districts and other entities. The board has authority to collect and retain nonlicensed staff data on behalf of the Department of Education. The board must share licensed and nonlicensed staff data with the department as outlined in the data sharing agreement required under paragraph (d). The department may access and use the data as required under federal or state law and for the purposes outlined in the data sharing agreement. (d) The Board of School Administrators and the Department of Education must enter into a data sharing agreement to share educational data at the E-12 level for the limited purpose of program approval and improvement for education administration programs. The program approval process must include targeted redesign of education administration preparation programs to address identified E-12 student areas of concern. new text begin (e) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board and the Board of School Administrators must enter into a data sharing agreement to share data in the staff automated reporting system for the limited purpose of managing and processing administrative licenses, including overseeing ethics and compliance. The board must share licensed staff data with the Board of School Administrators as outlined in the data sharing agreement. The Board of School Administrators may access and use the data as required under federal or state law and for the purposes outlined in the data sharing agreement. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end For purposes of the data sharing agreements under paragraphs (c) deleted text begin and (d)deleted text end new text begin to (e)new text end , the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board, Board of School Administrators, and Department of Education may share private data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, on teachers and school administrators. The data sharing agreements must not include educational data, as defined in section 13.32, subdivision 1, but may include summary data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 19, derived from educational data. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 122A.181, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Term of license and renewal. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must issue an initial Tier 1 license for a term of one year. A Tier 1 license may be renewed subject to paragraphs (b) to (d). (b) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must renew a Tier 1 license if: (1) the district or charter school requesting the renewal demonstrates that it has posted the teacher position but was unable to hire an acceptable teacher with a Tier 2, 3, or 4 license for the position; (2) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license took a content examination in accordance with section 122A.185 and submitted the examination results to the teacher's employing district or charter school within one year of the board approving the request for the initial Tier 1 license; (3) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license participated in cultural competency training consistent with section 120B.30, subdivision 8, within one year of the board approving the request for the initial Tier 1 license; and (4) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license met the mental deleted text begin illnessdeleted text end new text begin healthnew text end training renewal requirement under section 122A.187, subdivision 6. The requirement in clause (2) does not apply to a teacher that teaches a class in a career and technical education or career pathways course of study. (c) A Tier 1 license must not be renewed more than three times, unless the requesting district or charter school can show good cause for additional renewals. A Tier 1 license issued to teach (1) a class or course in a career and technical education or career pathway course of study, or (2) in a shortage area, as defined in section 122A.06, subdivision 6, may be renewed without limitation. (d) Starting July 1, 2027, a Tier 1 licensed early childhood education teacher, elementary education teacher, special education teacher who is responsible for teaching reading, kindergarten through grade 12 English as a second language teacher, grade 4 through 12 classroom teacher responsible for foundational reading skills instruction, teacher who provides instruction to students in a state-approved alternative program, or a teacher who is responsible for selecting literacy curriculum materials for grades 6 through 12, must demonstrate progress toward meeting the evidence-based literacy training requirements of section 120B.123, subdivision 5a, for their second licensure renewal. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.182, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirements. The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must approve an application for a Tier 2 license in a specified content area if: (1) the application has been submitted jointly by the applicant and the district; (2) the application has been paid for by the district or the applicant; (3) the applicant holds a bachelor's degree, unless specifically exempt by statute or rule; (4) the district demonstrates that a criminal background check under section 122A.18, subdivision 8, has been completed for the applicant; and (5) the applicant: (i) deleted text begin has completed a state-approved teacher preparation program;deleted text end deleted text begin (ii)deleted text end is enrolled in a Minnesota-approved teacher preparation program; deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin (ii) is enrolled in a state-approved teacher preparation program in a bordering state with equivalent student teaching requirements; new text end new text begin (iii) is enrolled in a state-approved teacher preparation program not offered in Minnesota with equivalent student teaching requirements; new text end new text begin (iv) is enrolled in a state-approved teacher preparation program in a shortage area with equivalent student teaching requirements; or new text end deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (v)new text end has a master's degree in the specified content area. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 122A.182, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Term of license and renewal. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must issue an initial Tier 2 license for a term of two years. A Tier 2 license may be renewed three times. (b) Before a Tier 2 license is renewed for the first time, a teacher holding a Tier 2 license must participate in cultural competency training consistent with section 120B.30, subdivision 8, and mental deleted text begin illnessdeleted text end new text begin healthnew text end training under section 122A.187, subdivision 6. (c) Starting July 1, 2027, a Tier 2 licensed early childhood education teacher, elementary education teacher, special education teacher who is responsible for teaching reading, kindergarten through grade 12 English as a second language teacher, grade 4 through 12 classroom teacher responsible for foundational reading skills instruction, teacher who provides instruction to students in a state-approved alternative program, or a teacher who is responsible for selecting literacy curriculum materials for grades 6 through 12, must demonstrate that they have made progress toward completing the evidence-based literacy training requirements of section 120B.123, subdivision 5a, for the first renewal of their initial license. (d) The board must issue rules setting forth the conditions for additional renewals after the initial license has been renewed three times. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.182, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Limitations on license. (a) A Tier 2 license is limited to the content matter indicated on the application for the initial Tier 2 license under subdivision 1, and limited to the district or charter school that requested the initial Tier 2 license. (b) A Tier 2 license shall not be construed to bring an individual within the definition of a teacher for purposes of section 122A.40, subdivision 1, or 122A.41, subdivision 1, clause (a). new text begin (c) A Tier 2 licensed teacher who obtains a Tier 2 license based on their enrollment in a state-approved teacher preparation program under subdivision 1, clause (5), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), does not mean the teacher met the coursework requirements under section 122A.183, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (5), to obtain a Tier 3 license after three years of teaching experience under a Tier 2 license. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.187, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Mental deleted text begin illnessdeleted text end new text begin healthnew text end . The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules that require all licensed teachers renewing a teaching license under sections 122A.181 to 122A.184 to include in the renewal requirements deleted text begin at least one hour of suicide prevention best practices trainingdeleted text end new text begin focused professional development of at least five hours in student mental health and wellnessnew text end in each licensure renewal period based on nationally recognized evidence-based programs and practices, among the continuing education credits required to renew a license under this subdivision. Initial training must include understanding the key warning signs new text begin and characteristics new text end of early-onset mental illness in children and adolescents, deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin including how to address mental health concerns where a child may pose a threat to themselves or others.new text end During subsequent licensure renewal periods, training must include a more in-depth understanding of students' mental illness trauma, accommodations for students' mental illness, parents' roles in addressing students' mental illness, Fetal Alcohol Spectrum Disorders, new text begin suicide prevention, new text end autism, the requirements of section 125A.0942 governing restrictive procedures, and de-escalation methods, among other similar topics.new text begin This subdivision does not allow or require teachers to diagnose or create treatment plans for mental illness.new text end Sec. 13. new text begin [122A.93] INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY COMPACT. new text end new text begin ARTICLE I new text end new text begin PURPOSE new text end new text begin The purpose of this compact is to facilitate the mobility of teachers across the member states, with the goal of supporting teachers through a new pathway to licensure. Through this compact, the member states seek to establish a collective regulatory framework that expedites and enhances the ability of teachers to move across state lines. new text end new text begin This compact is intended to achieve the following objectives and should be interpreted accordingly. The member states hereby ratify the same intentions by subscribing hereto. new text end new text begin (1) Create a streamlined pathway to licensure mobility for teachers; new text end new text begin (2) Support the relocation of eligible military spouses; new text end new text begin (3) Facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary information between the member states; new text end new text begin (4) Enhance the power of state and district level education officials to hire qualified, competent teachers by removing barriers to the employment of out-of-state teachers; new text end new text begin (5) Support the retention of teachers in the profession by removing barriers to relicensure in a new state; and new text end new text begin (6) Maintain state sovereignty in the regulation of the teaching profession. new text end new text begin ARTICLE II new text end new text begin DEFINITIONS new text end new text begin As used in this compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following definitions shall govern the terms herein: new text end new text begin (1) "Active military member" means any person with full-time duty status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve. new text end new text begin (2) "Adverse action" means any limitation or restriction imposed by a member state's licensing authority, such as revocation, suspension, reprimand, probation, or limitation on the licensee's ability to work as a teacher. new text end new text begin (3) "Bylaws" means those bylaws established by the commission. new text end new text begin (4) "Career and technical education license" means a current, valid authorization issued by a member state's licensing authority allowing an individual to serve as a teacher in P-12 public educational settings in a specific career and technical education area. new text end new text begin (5) "Charter member states" means a member state that has enacted legislation to adopt this compact where such legislation predates the initial meeting of the commission after the effective date of the compact. new text end new text begin (6) "Commission" means the interstate administrative body which membership consists of delegates of all states that have enacted this compact, and which is known as the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact Commission. new text end new text begin (7) "Commissioner" means the delegate of a member state. new text end new text begin (8) "Eligible license" means a license to engage in the teaching profession which requires at least a bachelor's degree and the completion of a state approved program for teacher licensure. new text end new text begin (9) "Eligible military spouse" means the spouse of any individual in full-time duty status in the active armed forces of the United States including members of the National Guard and Reserve moving as a result of a military mission or military career progression requirements or are on their terminal move as a result of separation or retirement (to include surviving spouses of deceased military members). new text end new text begin (10) "Executive committee" means a group of commissioners elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the commission as provided for herein. new text end new text begin (11) "Licensing authority" means an official, agency, board, or other entity of a state that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of teachers authorized to teach in P-12 public educational settings. new text end new text begin (12) "Member state" means any state that has adopted this compact, including all agencies and officials of such a state. new text end new text begin (13) "Receiving state" means any state where a teacher has applied for licensure under this compact. new text end new text begin (14) "Rule" means any regulation promulgated by the commission under this compact, which shall have the force of law in each member state. new text end new text begin (15) "State" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, and the District of Columbia. new text end new text begin (16) "State practice laws" means a member state's laws, rules, and regulations that govern the teaching profession, define the scope of such profession, and create the methods and grounds for imposing discipline. new text end new text begin (17) "State specific requirements" means a requirement for licensure covered in coursework or examination that includes content of unique interest to the state. new text end new text begin (18) "Teacher" means an individual who currently holds an authorization from a member state that forms the basis for employment in the P-12 public schools of the state to provide instruction in a specific subject area, grade level, or student population. new text end new text begin (19) "Unencumbered license" means a current, valid authorization issued by a member state's licensing authority allowing an individual to serve as a teacher in P-12 public educational settings. An unencumbered license is not a restricted, probationary, provisional, substitute or temporary credential. new text end new text begin ARTICLE III new text end new text begin LICENSURE UNDER THE COMPACT new text end new text begin (a) Licensure under this compact pertains only to the initial grant of a license by the receiving state. Nothing herein applies to any subsequent or ongoing compliance requirements that a receiving state might require for teachers. new text end new text begin (b) Each member state shall, in accordance with the rules of the commission, define, compile, and update as necessary, a list of eligible licenses and career and technical education licenses that the member state is willing to consider for equivalency under this compact and provide the list to the commission. The list shall include those licenses that a receiving state is willing to grant to teachers from other member states, pending a determination of equivalency by the receiving state's licensing authority. new text end new text begin (c) Upon the receipt of an application for licensure by a teacher holding an unencumbered eligible license, the receiving state shall determine which of the receiving state's eligible licenses the teacher is qualified to hold and shall grant such a license or licenses to the applicant. Such a determination shall be made in the sole discretion of the receiving state's licensing authority and may include a determination that the applicant is not eligible for any of the receiving state's eligible licenses. For all teachers who hold an unencumbered license, the receiving state shall grant one or more unencumbered license(s) that, in the receiving state's sole discretion, are equivalent to the licenses held by the teacher in any other member state. new text end new text begin (d) For active military members and eligible military spouses who hold a license that is not unencumbered, the receiving state shall grant an equivalent license or licenses that, in the receiving state's sole discretion, is equivalent to the license or licenses held by the teacher in any other member state, except where the receiving state does not have an equivalent license. new text end new text begin (e) For a teacher holding an unencumbered career and technical education license, the receiving state shall grant an unencumbered license equivalent to the career and technical education license held by the applying teacher and issued by another member state, as determined by the receiving state in its sole discretion, except where a career and technical education teacher does not hold a bachelor's degree and the receiving state requires a bachelor's degree for licenses to teach career and technical education. A receiving state may require career and technical education teachers to meet state industry recognized requirements, if required by law in the receiving state. new text end new text begin ARTICLE IV new text end new text begin LICENSURE NOT UNDER THE COMPACT new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in article III above, nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit or inhibit the power of a member state to regulate licensure or endorsements overseen by the member state's licensing authority. new text end new text begin (b) When a teacher is required to renew a license received pursuant to this compact, the state granting such a license may require the teacher to complete state specific requirements as a condition of licensure renewal or advancement in that state. new text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of determining compensation, a receiving state may require additional information from teachers receiving a license under the provisions of this compact. new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit the power of a member state to control and maintain ownership of its information pertaining to teachers, or limit the application of a member state's laws or regulations governing the ownership, use, or dissemination of information pertaining to teachers. new text end new text begin (e) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or alter any existing agreement or other cooperative arrangement which a member state may already be a party to, or limit the ability of a member state to participate in any future agreement or other cooperative arrangement to: new text end new text begin (1) award teaching licenses or other benefits based on additional professional credentials, including, but not limited to national board certification; new text end new text begin (2) participate in the exchange of names of teachers whose license has been subject to an adverse action by a member state; or new text end new text begin (3) participate in any agreement or cooperative arrangement with a non-member state. new text end new text begin ARTICLE V new text end new text begin TEACHER QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSURE UNDER new text end new text begin THE COMPACT new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided for active military members or eligible military spouses in article III.D above, a teacher may only be eligible to receive a license under this compact where that teacher holds an unencumbered license in a member state. new text end new text begin (b) A teacher eligible to receive a license under this compact shall, unless otherwise provided for herein: new text end new text begin (1) upon their application to receive a license under this compact, undergo a criminal background check in the receiving state in accordance with the laws and regulations of the receiving state; and new text end new text begin (2) provide the receiving state with information in addition to the information required for licensure for the purposes of determining compensation, if applicable. new text end new text begin ARTICLE VI new text end new text begin DISCIPLINE AND ADVERSE ACTIONS new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to limit the authority of a member state to investigate or impose disciplinary measures on teachers according to the state practice laws thereof. new text end new text begin (b) Member states shall be authorized to receive, and shall provide, files and information regarding the investigation and discipline, if any, of teachers in other member states upon request. Any member state receiving such information or files shall protect and maintain the security and confidentiality thereof, in at least the same manner that it maintains its own investigatory or disciplinary files and information. Prior to disclosing any disciplinary or investigatory information received from another member state, the disclosing state shall communicate its intention and purpose for such disclosure to the member state which originally provided that information. new text end new text begin ARTICLE VII new text end new text begin ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY COMPACT new text end new text begin COMMISSION new text end new text begin (a) The interstate compact member states hereby create and establish a joint public agency known as the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact Commission: new text end new text begin (1) The commission is a joint interstate governmental agency comprised of states that have enacted the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact. new text end new text begin (2) Nothing in this interstate compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity. new text end new text begin (b) Membership, voting, and meetings new text end new text begin (1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate to the commission, who shall be given the title of commissioner. new text end new text begin (2) The commissioner shall be the primary administrative officer of the state licensing authority or their designee. new text end new text begin (3) Any commissioner may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the commissioner is appointed. new text end new text begin (4) The member state shall fill any vacancy occurring in the commission within 90 days. new text end new text begin (5) Each commissioner shall be entitled to one (1) vote about the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commission. A commissioner shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for commissioners' participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication. new text end new text begin (6) The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws. new text end new text begin (7) The commission shall establish by rule a term of office for commissioners. new text end new text begin (c) The commission shall have the following powers and duties: new text end new text begin (1) Establish a code of ethics for the commission. new text end new text begin (2) Establish the fiscal year of the commission. new text end new text begin (3) Establish bylaws for the commission. new text end new text begin (4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws of the commission. new text end new text begin (5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this interstate compact, the bylaws, and rules of the commission. new text end new text begin (6) Promulgate uniform rules to implement and administer this interstate compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all member states. In the event the commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes of the compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect of law. new text end new text begin (7) Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any member state licensing authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected. new text end new text begin (8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds. new text end new text begin (9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a member state, or an associated non-governmental organization that is open to membership by all states. new text end new text begin (10) Hire employees, elect, or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and establish the commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters. new text end new text begin (11) Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise own, hold, improve, or use, any property, real, personal or mixed, provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety. new text end new text begin (12) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed. new text end new text begin (13) Establish a budget and make expenditures. new text end new text begin (14) Borrow money. new text end new text begin (15) Appoint committees, including standing committees composed of members and such other interested persons as may be designated in this interstate compact, rules, or bylaws. new text end new text begin (16) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies. new text end new text begin (17) Establish and elect an executive committee. new text end new text begin (18) Establish and develop a charter for an executive information governance committee to advise on facilitating exchange of information; use of information, data privacy, and technical support needs, and provide reports as needed. new text end new text begin (19) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this interstate compact consistent with the state regulation of teacher licensure. new text end new text begin (20) Determine whether a state's adopted language is materially different from the model compact language such that the state would not qualify for participation in the compact. new text end new text begin (d) The executive committee of the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact Commission new text end new text begin (1) The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission according to the terms of this interstate compact. new text end new text begin (2) The executive committee shall be composed of eight voting members: new text end new text begin (i) the commission chair, vice chair, and treasurer; and new text end new text begin (ii) five members who are elected by the commission from the current membership: new text end new text begin (A) four voting members representing geographic regions in accordance with commission rules; and new text end new text begin (B) one at large voting member in accordance with commission rules. new text end new text begin (3) The commission may add or remove members of the executive committee as provided in commission rules. new text end new text begin (4) The executive committee shall meet at least once annually. new text end new text begin (5) The executive committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities: new text end new text begin (i) Recommend to the entire commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to the compact legislation, fees paid by interstate compact member states such as annual dues, and any compact fee charged by the member states on behalf of the commission. new text end new text begin (ii) Ensure commission administration services are appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise. new text end new text begin (iii) Prepare and recommend the budget. new text end new text begin (iv) Maintain financial records on behalf of the commission. new text end new text begin (v) Monitor compliance of member states and provide reports to the commission. new text end new text begin (vi) Perform other duties as provided in rules or bylaws. new text end new text begin (e) Meetings of the commission new text end new text begin (1) All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in accordance with commission bylaws. new text end new text begin (2) The commission or the executive committee or other committees of the commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting if the commission or executive committee or other committees of the commission must discuss: new text end new text begin (i) Non-compliance of a member state with its obligations under the compact. new text end new text begin (ii) The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the commission's internal personnel practices and procedures. new text end new text begin (iii) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation. new text end new text begin (iv) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate. new text end new text begin (v) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person. new text end new text begin (vi) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential. new text end new text begin (vii) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy. new text end new text begin (viii) Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes. new text end new text begin (ix) Disclosure of information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact. new text end new text begin (x) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state statute. new text end new text begin (xi) Others matters as set forth by commission bylaws and rules. new text end new text begin (3) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. new text end new text begin (4) The commission shall keep minutes of commission meetings and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (f) Financing of the commission new text end new text begin (1) The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities. new text end new text begin (2) The commission may accept all appropriate donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same, provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest. new text end new text begin (3) The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the commission, in accordance with the commission rules. new text end new text begin (4) The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state. new text end new text begin (5) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to accounting procedures established under commission bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds of the commission shall be reviewed annually in accordance with commission bylaws, and a report of the review shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission. new text end new text begin (g) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification new text end new text begin (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. new text end new text begin (2) The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct. new text end new text begin (3) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. new text end new text begin ARTICLE VIII new text end new text begin RULEMAKING new text end new text begin (a) The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this interstate compact and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment. new text end new text begin (b) The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules to achieve the intent and purpose of this interstate compact. In the event the commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond purpose and intent of this interstate compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect of law in the member states. new text end new text begin (c) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state. new text end new text begin (d) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted or ratified at a regular or special meeting of the commission in accordance with commission rules and bylaws. new text end new text begin (e) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule with 48 hours' notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to: new text end new text begin (1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare; new text end new text begin (2) prevent a loss of commission or member state funds; new text end new text begin (3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule; or new text end new text begin (4) protect public health and safety. new text end new text begin ARTICLE IX new text end new text begin FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE new text end new text begin (a) The commission shall provide for facilitating the exchange of information to administer and implement the provisions of this compact in accordance with the rules of the commission, consistent with generally accepted data protection principles. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to alter, limit, or inhibit the power of a member state to control and maintain ownership of its licensee information or alter, limit, or inhibit the laws or regulations governing licensee information in the member state. new text end new text begin ARTICLE X new text end new text begin OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT new text end new text begin (a) Oversight new text end new text begin (1) The executive and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact's purposes and intent. The provisions of this compact shall have standing as statutory law. new text end new text begin (2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter. new text end new text begin (3) All courts and all administrative agencies shall take judicial notice of the compact, the rules of the commission, and any information provided to a member state pursuant thereto in any judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of this compact, or which may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the commission. new text end new text begin (4) The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or promulgated rules. new text end new text begin (b) Default, technical assistance, and termination new text end new text begin (1) If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall: new text end new text begin (i) provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default or any other action to be taken by the commission; and new text end new text begin (ii) provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default. new text end new text begin (2) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the commissioners of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default. new text end new text begin (3) Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's legislature, the state licensing authority and each of the member states. new text end new text begin (4) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination. new text end new text begin (5) The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state. new text end new text begin (6) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. new text end new text begin (c) Dispute resolution new text end new text begin (1) Upon request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and between member and non-member states. new text end new text begin (2) The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both binding and non-binding alternative dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate. new text end new text begin (d) Enforcement new text end new text begin (1) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact. new text end new text begin (2) By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices against a member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law. new text end new text begin ARTICLE XI new text end new text begin EFFECTUATION, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT new text end new text begin (a) The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state. new text end new text begin (1) On or after the effective date of the compact, the commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the charter member states to determine if the statute enacted by each such charter member state is materially different from the model compact statute. new text end new text begin (2) A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different from the model compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in article X. new text end new text begin (3) Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the charter member states shall be subject to the process set forth in article VII.c.20 to determine if their enactments are materially different from the model compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in the compact. new text end new text begin (b) If any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws from the compact, the commission shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in effect even if the number of member states should be less than ten. new text end new text begin (c) Any state that joins the compact after the commission's initial adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state, as the rules and bylaws may be amended as provided in this compact. new text end new text begin (d) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same. new text end new text begin (1) A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute. new text end new text begin (2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state's licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to the effective date of withdrawal. new text end new text begin (e) This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states. new text end new text begin ARTICLE XII new text end new text begin CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY new text end new text begin This compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any member state or a state seeking membership in the compact, or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any member state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable matters. new text end new text begin ARTICLE XIII new text end new text begin CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS new text end new text begin (a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the compact. new text end new text begin (b) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict. new text end new text begin (c) All permissible agreements between the commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms. new text end ARTICLE 5 CHARTER SCHOOLS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124E.03, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Certain federal, state, and local requirements. (a) A charter school shall meet all federal, state, and local health and safety requirements applicable to school districts. (b) A charter school must comply with chapter 120B. (c) A charter school must comply with the Minnesota Public School Fee Law, sections 123B.34 to 123B.39. (d) A charter school is a district for the purposes of tort liability under chapter 466. (e) A charter school must comply with the Pledge of Allegiance requirement under section 121A.11, subdivision 3. (f) A charter school and charter school board of directors must comply with chapter 181 governing requirements for employment. (g) A charter school must comply with continuing truant notification under section 260A.03. (h) A charter school must develop and implement a teacher evaluation and peer review process under section 122A.40, subdivision 8, paragraph (b), clauses (2) to (13), and place students in classrooms in accordance with section 122A.40, subdivision 8, paragraph (d). The teacher evaluation process in this paragraph does not create any additional employment rights for teachers. (i) A charter school must adopt a plan, budget, and process, consistent with section 120B.11, to review curriculum, instruction, and student achievement and strive for comprehensive achievement and civic readiness. (j) A charter school is subject to and must comply with the Pupil Fair Dismissal Act, sections 121A.40 to 121A.56 and 121A.575, 121A.60, 121A.61, and 121A.65. new text begin (k) A charter school must comply with the limits on screen time under section 124D.166. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.05, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Corrective action. (a) If, consistent with this chapter, the commissioner finds that an authorizer has not met the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner may subject the authorizer to a corrective action plan, which may last no longer than deleted text begin 130deleted text end new text begin 145new text end business days. The commissioner may prohibit an authorizer on a correctivenew text begin actionnew text end plan from accepting a transfer application from a charter school and an application to establish a charter school. (b) The commissioner must notify the authorizer in writing that the authorizer has been placed on a correctivenew text begin actionnew text end plan. The notice must include deleted text begin anydeleted text end new text begin the commissioner's new text end findings deleted text begin that may subject the authorizer to corrective action at the conclusion of the corrective plan anddeleted text end new text begin consistent with paragraph (a).new text end The authorizer then has 15 business days to request an informal hearing deleted text begin before the commissioner takes corrective actiondeleted text end . The commissioner must hold an informal hearing within 15 business days of the request.new text begin The commissioner must make a determination on placing the authorizer on a corrective action plan within 15 business days of the informal hearing.new text end If the deleted text begin issues identified as the basis for the corrective action are not resolved at the informal hearingdeleted text end new text begin authorizer is placed on a corrective action plannew text end , the authorizer must make the requested improvements and notify the commissioner of the improvements within 45 business days. Within 20 business days, the commissioner must review the changes and notify the authorizer of any remaining issues to be resolved. An authorizer must address the remaining issues as directed by the commissioner within 20 business days. Within 15 business days, the commissioner must review the changes and notify the authorizer whether all issues in the correctivenew text begin actionnew text end plan have been resolved. (c) If the commissioner terminates the authorizer's ability to charter a school, the commissioner must assist the affected charter school in acquiring a new authorizer. deleted text begin A charter school board of directors may submit to the commissioner a request to transfer to a new authorizer without the approval or consent of the current authorizer if that authorizer has been under a corrective action plan for more than 130 business days.deleted text end new text begin The new authorizer and school must submit a change in authorizer request to the commissioner under section 124E.10, subdivision 5, without the agreement of the terminated authorizer.new text end (d) The commissioner may at any time take corrective action against an authorizer, including terminating an authorizer's ability to charter a school, terminating a contract with a charter school, and other appropriate sanctions for: (1) failing to demonstrate the criteria under subdivision 3 under which the commissioner approved the authorizer; (2) violating a term of the deleted text begin charteringdeleted text end new text begin charternew text end contract between the authorizer and the charter school board of directors; (3) unsatisfactory performance as an approved authorizer; (4) any good cause shown that gives the commissioner a legally sufficient reason to take corrective action against an authorizer; or (5) failing to meet the terms of a corrective action plan by the specified deadline. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.05, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Reports. By September 30 of each year, an authorizer shallnew text begin publish on its website andnew text end submit to the commissioner deleted text begin adeleted text end new text begin : (i) an annual financialnew text end statement deleted text begin of income and expendituresdeleted text end new text begin identifying the authorizer's sources of income related to authorizing activities and the authorizer's related expenses, including staff, consultants, facility, professional development, transportation, membership dues, technology, office supplies, bank fees, administrative overhead, and professional fees for accounting, legal, and financial services; and (ii) a balance sheet statement summarizing assets and liabilitiesnew text end related to deleted text begin charteringdeleted text end new text begin authorizingnew text end activities deleted text begin duringdeleted text end new text begin fornew text end the previous school year ending June 30. The authorizer must transmit a copy of the deleted text begin statementdeleted text end new text begin statementsnew text end to all schools it charters. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Initial board of directors. new text begin (a) new text end Before entering into a contract or other agreement for professional or other services, goods, or facilities, the operators authorized to organize and operate a school must establish a board of directors composed of at least five members. The initial board members must not be related parties. The initial board continues to serve until a timely election for members of the ongoing charter school board of directors is held according to the school's articles and bylaws under subdivision 4. The initial board of directors and school developers must comply with the training requirements in subdivision 7 upon the incorporation of the school. new text begin (b) The initial board must include: new text end new text begin (1) at least one licensed teacher; new text end new text begin (2) at least one prospective parent or legal guardian of a student who is not an employee of the charter school; and new text end new text begin (3) at least one interested community member. new text end new text begin (c) An individual serving on the initial board must reside in Minnesota. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124E.07, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Ongoing board of directors. new text begin (a) new text end The initial board must begin the transition to the ongoing board structure by the end of the first year of operation and complete the transition by the end of the second year of operation. The terms of board members shall begin on July 1. Terms shall be no less than two years. The bylaws shall set the number of terms an individual may serve on the board and as an officer of the board. new text begin (b) A board member who is paid for serving on the charter school board must not receive more compensation for their role as a charter school board member than a school board member in the school district in which the charter school is located. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124E.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Membership criteria. (a) The ongoing charter school board of directors shall have at least five members. The board members must not be related parties. The ongoing board must include: (1) at least one licensed teacher; (2) at least one parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled in the charter school who is not an employee of the charter school; and (3) at least one interested community member. A community member serving on the board must reside in Minnesota, must not have a child enrolled in the school, and must not be an employee of the charter school. (b) To serve as a licensed teacher on a charter school board, an individual must: (1) be employed by the school or provide at least 720 hours of service under a contract between the charter school and a teacher cooperative; (2) be a qualified teacher as defined under section 122A.16, either serving as a teacher of record in a field in which the individual has a field license, or providing services to students the individual is licensed to provide; and (3) not serve in an administrative or supervisory capacity for more than 240 hours in a school calendar year. deleted text begin (c) The board structure must be defined in the bylaws. The board structure may (1) be a majority of teachers under paragraph (b), (2) be a majority of parents, (3) be a majority of community members, or (4) have no clear majority. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The chief administrator may only serve as an ex-officio nonvoting board member. No charter school employees shall serve on the board other than teachers under paragraph (b). deleted text begin (e) A contractor providing facilities, goods, or services to a charter school must not serve on the board of directors. In addition, an individual is prohibited from serving as a member of the charter school board of directors if: (1) the individual, an immediate family member, or the individual's partner is a full or part owner or principal with a for-profit or nonprofit entity or independent contractor with whom the charter school contracts, directly or indirectly, for professional services, goods, or facilities; or (2) an immediate family member is an employee of the school. An individual may serve as a member of the board of directors if no conflict of interest exists under this paragraph, consistent with this section. deleted text end deleted text begin (f) A violation of paragraph (e) renders a contract voidable at the option of the commissioner or the charter school board of directors. A member of a charter school board of directors who violates paragraph (e) is individually liable to the charter school for any damage caused by the violation. deleted text end deleted text begin (g) Any employee, agent, contractor, or board member of the authorizer who participates in initially reviewing, approving, overseeing, evaluating, renewing, or not renewing the charter school is ineligible to serve on the board of directors of a school chartered by that authorizer. deleted text end deleted text begin (h) An individual is prohibited from serving on more than one charter school board at the same time in either an elected or ex-officio capacity, except that an individual serving as an administrator serving more than one school under section 124E.12, subdivision 2, paragraph (f), may serve on each board as an ex-officio member. A board member who violates this paragraph is ineligible to continue to serve as a charter school board member and is ineligible to be elected or appointed to a charter school board for 24 months. deleted text end deleted text begin (i) A board member, who is paid for serving on the charter school board, must not receive more compensation for their role as a charter school board member than a school board member in the school district in which the charter school is located. deleted text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Conflict of interest. new text end new text begin (a) A contractor providing facilities, goods, or services to a charter school must not serve on the board of directors. In addition, an individual is prohibited from serving as a member of the charter school board of directors if: new text end new text begin (1) the individual, an immediate family member, or the individual's partner is a full or part owner or principal with a for-profit or nonprofit entity or independent contractor with whom the charter school contracts, directly or indirectly, for professional services, goods, or facilities; or new text end new text begin (2) an immediate family member is an employee of the school. new text end new text begin An individual may serve as a member of the board of directors if no conflict of interest exists under this paragraph, consistent with this section. new text end new text begin (b) A violation of paragraph (a) renders a contract voidable at the option of the commissioner or the charter school board of directors. A member of a charter school board of directors who violates paragraph (a) is individually liable to the charter school for any damage caused by the violation. new text end new text begin (c) Any employee, agent, contractor, or board member of the authorizer who participates in initially reviewing, approving, overseeing, evaluating, renewing, or not renewing the charter school is ineligible to serve on the board of directors of a school chartered by that authorizer. new text end new text begin (d) An individual is prohibited from serving on more than one charter school board at the same time in either an elected or ex-officio capacity, except that an individual serving as an administrator serving more than one school under section 124E.12, subdivision 2, paragraph (f), may serve on each board as an ex-officio member. A board member who violates this paragraph is ineligible to continue to serve as a charter school board member and is ineligible to be elected or appointed to a charter school board for 24 months. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.07, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Board structure. new text begin (a) The board structure must be defined in the bylaws. The board structure may: new text end new text begin (1) be a majority of teachers under subdivision 3, paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (2) be a majority of parents; new text end new text begin (3) be a majority of community members; or new text end new text begin (4) have no clear majority. new text end new text begin (b) new text end Board bylaws shall outline the process and procedures for changing the board's governance structure, consistent with chapter 317A. A board may change its governance structure only: (1) by a majority vote of the board of directors; (2) by a majority vote of the licensed teachers employed by the school as teachers who provide instruction to students, including licensed teachers providing instruction under a contract between the school and a cooperative; and (3) with the authorizer's approval. new text begin (c) new text end Any change in board governance structure must conform with the board composition established under this section. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.08, is amended to read: 124E.08 CHARTER SCHOOL AND SCHOOL DISTRICT COLLABORATION. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Collaboration between a charter school and school district. new text end (a) A charter school board may voluntarily enter into a two-year, renewable collaboration agreement with a school district in which the charter school is geographically located to enhance the achievement of the students in the district and the students in the charter school. new text begin (b)new text end A school district does not need to be either an approved authorizer or the authorizer of the charter school to enter into a collaboration agreement under this section. new text begin (c)new text end A charter school authorizer is prohibited from requiring a collaboration agreement as a condition of entering into or renewing a charter contract as defined in section 124E.10, subdivision 1. new text begin (d) Nothing in this section or in the collaboration agreement may impact in any way the authority or autonomy of the charter school. new text end new text begin (e) Nothing in this section or in the collaboration agreement shall cause the state to pay twice for the same student, service, or facility or otherwise impact state funding or payment to the school district or the charter school. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Collaboration agreement provisions. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (a)new text end The collaboration agreement may include, but is not limited to, collaboration regarding facilities, transportation, training, student achievement, assessments, mutual performance standards, and other areas of mutual agreement. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end For purposes of student assessment and reporting to the state under section 120B.36, the school district may include the academic performance of the students of a collaborative charter school site under new text begin subdivision 1, new text end paragraph (a). new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Accountability measures. new text end Districtsdeleted text begin , authorizers,deleted text end or charter schools entering into a deleted text begin collaborativedeleted text end new text begin collaborationnew text end agreement are equally and collectively subject to the same state and federal accountability measures for student achievement, school performance outcomes, and school improvement strategies. The deleted text begin collaborativedeleted text end new text begin collaborationnew text end agreement and all accountability measures must be posted on the district, charter school, and authorizer websites. deleted text begin (d) Nothing in this section or in the collaboration agreement may impact in any way the authority or autonomy of the charter school. deleted text end deleted text begin (e) Nothing in this section or in the collaboration agreement shall cause the state to pay twice for the same student, service, or facility or otherwise impact state funding or payment to the school district or the charter school. deleted text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124E.17, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Charter school information. (a) Charter schools must disseminate information about the school's offerings and enrollment procedures to families that reflect the diversity of Minnesota's population and targeted groups. Targeted groups include low-income families and communities, students of color, students at risk of academic failure, and students underrepresented in the school's student body relative to Minnesota's population. The school must document its dissemination activities in the school's annual report. The school's dissemination activities must be a component of the authorizer's performance review of the school. (b) Authorizers and the commissioner must disseminate information to the public on how to form and operate a charter school. Authorizers, operators, and the commissioner also may disseminate information to interested stakeholders about the successful best practices in teaching and learning demonstrated by charter schools. (c) For each charter school it authorizes, new text begin within 15 business days of execution, new text end an authorizer must publish on its website for at least five years from the date of issuance all charter contracts and amendments executed under section 124E.10; school performance reviews including the performance evaluations required by section 124E.10, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (6), if different; notices of intent to terminate or not renew the charter contract and related final determinations; and unresolved notices of intervention, deficiency, concern, corrective action, or probationary status. (d) Each charter school must post a link in a conspicuous place on the school's official website to the section of its authorizer's website where information listed in paragraph (c) specific to that school is published. A charter school must also, upon the request of the authorizer, distribute information from their authorizer about interventions, corrective actions, and probationary status by publication, mail, or electronic means to its authorizer, school employees, and parents and legal guardians of students enrolled in the charter schoolnew text begin in languages parents and legal guardians of students enrolled in the charter school understand, consistent with the school's language access plan under section 124E.03, subdivision 9, paragraph (b)new text end . Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124E.17, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Financial information. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end Upon request of an individual, the charter school must make available in a timely fashion financial statements showing all operations and transactions affecting the school's income, surplus, and deficit during the last annual accounting period; and a balance sheet summarizing assets and liabilities on the closing date of the accounting period. deleted text begin (b) An authorizer must publish on its website an annual financial statement identifying its sources of income related to authorizing activities and its authorizing expenses including staff, consultants, facility, professional development, transportation, membership dues, technology, office supplies, bank fees, administrative overhead, and professional fees for accounting, legal, and financial services, consistent with section 124E.05, subdivision 8, and a balance sheet related to authorizing activities summarizing assets and liabilities. deleted text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124E.27, is amended to read: 124E.27 CMO AND EMO PUBLIC ACCOUNTING AND REPORTING. (a) A charter school that enters into a management agreement with a CMO or EMO must: (1) publish on the charter school website for at least 20 business days the proposed final agreement for public review and comment before the school board may adopt the contract or agreement. Any changes made to the posted agreement during the public review period or any proposed amendments to the agreement once adopted must be posted for 20 business days before the board may adopt the amendments to the contract; (2) annually publish on the charter school website a statement of assurance that no member of the school board, staff, or any agent of the school has been promised or received any form of compensation or gifts from the CMO or EMO and that no board member, employee, or agent of the CMO or EMO or any of the organization affiliates or providers serve on the charter school board; and (3) conduct an independent review and evaluation of the services provided by the CMO or EMO and publish the evaluation on the school's website at least 30 business days before the end of the current contract. (b) A management agreement with a CMO or EMO must contain the following: (1) the term of the contract, not to exceed five years; (2) the total dollar value of the contract including the annual projected costs of services; (3) a description and terms of the services to be provided during the term of the contract; (4) notice that a charter school closure during the term of the contract by action of the authorizer or the school's board results in the balance of the current contract becoming null and void; (5) an annual statement of assurance to the charter school board that the CMO or EMO provided no compensation or gifts to any charter school board member, staff member, or agent of the charter school; (6) an annual statement of assurance that no board member, employee, contractor, or agent of the CMO or EMO or any affiliated organization is a board member of the charter school or any other charter school; (7) the policies and protocols that meet federal and state laws regarding student and personnel data collection, usage, access, retention, disclosure and destruction, and indemnification and warranty provisions in case of data breaches by the CMO or EMO; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (8) an annual assurance that all assets purchased on behalf of the charter school using public funds remain assets of the schooldeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (9) an annual assurance that the charter school remains independent from the management organization; new text end new text begin (10) an annual assurance that the charter school selects and retains its own legal counsel and auditing firm; new text end new text begin (11) an outline of comprehensive policies and protocols, including detailed provisions on compensation and payment terms, clearly defined remedies for breach of contract, and an explicit delineation of responsibilities and rights in the event of organizational closure; new text end new text begin (12) a statement that provides the school board with the clear ability to terminate the agreement; new text end new text begin (13) a statement asserting that all assets purchased with school money or awards from school funds remain with the school; new text end new text begin (14) a provision that prohibits sweeps contracts where the management organization calculates fees for services based upon the school's total revenue; and new text end new text begin (15) a statement that fees charged for services by the management organization are reasonable, proportionate, and appropriate for the value delivered. new text end (c) The CMO or EMO must annually provide the charter school board a financial report by July 31 that accounts for income and expenditures for the previous fiscal year using the account categories in uniform financial accounting and reporting standards. (d) Any agreement with a CMO or EMO containing any of the following provisions is null and void: (1) restrictions on the charter school's ability to operate a school upon termination of the agreement; (2) restrictions on the annual or total amount of the school's operating surplus or fund balance; (3) authorization to allow a CMO or EMO to withdraw funds from a charter school account; or (4) authorization to allow a CMO or EMO to loan funds to the charter school. (e) A CMO or EMO or its affiliates, employees, or agents may not contract with, be employed by, or serve on the board of an authorizer. An authorizer or its affiliates, employees, or agents may not contract with, be employed by, serve as a paid consultant for, or serve as a board member of a CMO or EMO. Sec. 13. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124E.16, subdivision 4, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end ARTICLE 6 HEALTH AND SAFETY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.031, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given them. (b) "District" means a district under section 120A.05, subdivision 8. (c) "Public school" or "school" means a public school under section 120A.05, subdivisions 9, 11, 13, and 17deleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin ;new text end a charter school under chapter 124Enew text begin ; an intermediate school district; and a Tribal contract schoolnew text end . (d) "Student" means a student enrolled in a school under paragraph (c). (e) "Bullying" means intimidating, threatening, abusive, or harming conduct that is objectively offensive and: (1) there is an actual or perceived imbalance of power between the student engaging in prohibited conduct and the target of the behavior and the conduct is repeated or forms a pattern; or (2) materially and substantially interferes with a student's educational opportunities or performance or ability to participate in school functions or activities or receive school benefits, services, or privileges. (f) "Cyberbullying" means bullying using technology or other electronic communication, including but not limited to a transfer of a sign, signal, writing, image, sound, or data, including a post on a social network Internet website or forum, transmitted through a computer, cell phone, or other electronic device. (g) Intimidating, threatening, abusive, or harming conduct may involve, but is not limited to, conduct that causes physical harm to a student or a student's property or causes a student to be in reasonable fear of harm to person or property; under Minnesota common law, violates a student's reasonable expectation of privacy, defames a student, or constitutes intentional infliction of emotional distress against a student; is directed at any student or students, including those based on a person's actual or perceived race, ethnicity, color, creed, religion, national origin, immigration status, sex, marital status, familial status, socioeconomic status, physical appearance, sexual orientation, including gender identity and expression, academic status related to student performance, disability, or status with regard to public assistance, age, or any additional characteristic defined in chapter 363A. However, prohibited conduct need not be based on any particular characteristic defined in this paragraph or chapter 363A. (h) "Prohibited conduct" means bullying or cyberbullying as defined under this subdivision or retaliation for asserting, alleging, reporting, or providing information about such conduct or knowingly making a false report about bullying. deleted text begin (i) "Remedial response" means a measure to stop and correct prohibited conduct, prevent prohibited conduct from recurring, and protect, support, and intervene on behalf of the student who is the target of the prohibited conduct. deleted text end new text begin (i) "Actor" means a student who engages in bullying behavior. new text end new text begin (j) "Target" means a student who experiences bullying behavior. new text end new text begin (k) "Supportive interventions" include but are not limited to trauma-informed assessments, culturally responsive mental health services, restorative practices, counseling, and individualized educational or behavioral supports designed to address underlying causes of behavior. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.031, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Local district and school policy. (a) Districts and schools, in consultation with students, parents, and community organizations, to the extent practicable, shall adopt, implement, and, on a cycle consistent with other district policies, review, and revise where appropriate, a written policy to prevent and prohibit student bullying consistent with this section. The policy must conform with sections 121A.41 to 121A.56. A district or school must adopt and implement a local policy under subdivisions 3 to 5 or comply with the provisions of the state model policy in subdivision 6. (b) Each local district and school policy must establish research-based, developmentally appropriate best practices that include preventive and remedial measures and effective discipline for deterring policy violations; apply throughout the school or district; and foster active student, parent, and community participation. The policy shall: (1) define the roles and responsibilities of students, school personnel, and volunteers under the policy; (2) specifically list the characteristics contained in subdivision 2, paragraph (g); (3) emphasize deleted text begin remedial responsesdeleted text end new text begin comprehensive, supportive interventionsnew text end ; (4) be conspicuously posted in the administrative offices of the school and school district in summary form; (5) be given to each school employee and independent contractor, if a contractor regularly interacts with students, at the time of employment with the district or school; (6) be included in the student handbook on school policies; and (7) be available to all parents and other school community members in an electronic format in the languages appearing on the district or school website, consistent with the district policies and practices. (c) Consistent with its applicable policies and practices, each district and school under this subdivision must discuss its policy with students, school personnel, and volunteers and provide appropriate training for all school personnel to prevent, identify, and respond to prohibited conduct. Districts and schools must establish a training cycle, not to exceed a period of three school years, for school personnel under this paragraph. Newly employed school personnel must receive the training within the first year of their employment with the district or school. A district or school administrator may accelerate the training cycle or provide additional training based on a particular need or circumstance. (d) Each district and school under this subdivision must submit an electronic copy of its prohibited conduct policy to the commissioner. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 121A.031, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Local policy components. (a) Each district and school policy implemented under this section must, at a minimum: (1) designate a staff member as the primary contact person in the school building to receive reports of prohibited conduct under clause (3), ensure the policy and its procedures including restorative practices, consequences, and sanctions are fairly and fully implemented, and serve as the primary contact on policy and procedural matters implicating both the district or school and the department; (2) require school employees who witness prohibited conduct or possess reliable information that would lead a reasonable person to suspect that a student is a target of prohibited conduct to make reasonable efforts to address and resolve the prohibited conduct; (3) provide a procedure to begin to investigate reports of prohibited conduct within three school days of the report, and make the primary contact person responsible for the investigation and any resulting record and for keeping and regulating access to any record; (4) indicate how a school will respond to an identified incident of prohibited conduct, including immediately intervening to protect the target of the prohibited conduct; at the school administrator's discretion and consistent with state and federal data practices law governing access to data, including section 13.02, subdivision 8, a presumption that a district or school official will notify the parent of the reported target of the prohibited conduct and the parent of the actor engaged in the prohibited conduct; providing other deleted text begin remedial responses to the prohibited conductdeleted text end new text begin comprehensive, supportive interventionsnew text end ; and ensuring that deleted text begin remedial responsesdeleted text end new text begin interventionsnew text end are tailored to the particular incident and nature of the conduct and the student's developmental age and behavioral history. For purposes of the notification presumed under this clause, a parent or legal guardian may designate in writing to the school another individual to be notified of the prohibited conduct; (5) prohibit reprisals or retaliation against any person who asserts, alleges, or reports prohibited conduct or provides information about such conduct and establish appropriate consequences for a person who engages in reprisal or retaliation; (6) allow anonymous reporting but do not rely solely on an anonymous report to determine discipline; (7) provide information about available community resources to the target, actor, and other affected individuals, as appropriate; (8) where appropriate for a child with a disability to prevent or respond to prohibited conduct, allow the child's individualized education program or section 504 plan to address the skills and proficiencies the child needs to respond to or not engage in prohibited conduct; (9) use new employee training materials, the school publication on school rules, procedures, and standards of conduct, and the student handbook on school policies to publicize the policy; (10) require ongoing professional development, consistent with section 122A.60, to build the skills of all school personnel who regularly interact with students, including but not limited to educators, administrators, school counselors, social workers, psychologists, other school mental health professionals, school nurses, cafeteria workers, custodians, bus drivers, athletic coaches, extracurricular activities advisors, and paraprofessionals to identify, prevent, and appropriately address prohibited conduct; (11) allow the alleged actor in an investigation of prohibited conduct to present a defense; and (12) inform affected students and their parents of their rights under state and federal data practices laws to obtain access to data related to the incident and their right to contest the accuracy or completeness of the data. (b) Professional development under a local policy includes, but is not limited to, information about: (1) developmentally appropriate strategies both to prevent and to immediately and effectively intervene to stop prohibited conduct; (2) the complex dynamics affecting an actor, target, and witnesses to prohibited conduct; (3) research on prohibited conduct, including specific categories of students at risk for prohibited conduct in school; (4) the incidence and nature of cyberbullying; and (5) Internet safety and cyberbullying. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.031, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Policy alignment. new text end new text begin Before the start of the 2027-2028 school year, a district or school must review and, when necessary, revise its bullying prevention policy to align with the requirements in subdivision 5a. As part of the review and revision, a district or school must remove policy references to "remedial responses" and replace the term with language reflecting comprehensive, supportive interventions. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.031, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Safe and supportive schools programming. (a) Districts and schools are encouraged to provide developmentally appropriate programmatic instruction to help students identify, prevent, and reduce prohibited conduct; value diversity in school and society; develop and improve students' knowledge and skills for solving problems, managing conflict, engaging in civil discourse, and recognizing, responding to, and reporting prohibited conduct; and make effective prevention and intervention programs available to students. Districts and schools must establish strategies for creating a positive school climate and use evidence-based social-emotional learning to prevent and reduce discrimination and other improper conduct. (b) Districts and schools are encouraged to: (1) engage all students in creating a safe and supportive school environment; (2) partner with parents and other community members to develop and implement prevention and intervention programs; (3) engage all students and adults in integrating educationdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin and comprehensive, supportivenew text end interventiondeleted text begin , and other remedial responsesdeleted text end into the school environment; (4) train student bystanders to intervene in and report incidents of prohibited conduct to the school's primary contact person; (5) teach students to advocate for themselves and others; (6) prevent inappropriate referrals to special education of students who may engage in prohibited conduct; and (7) foster student collaborations that foster a safe and supportive school climate. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.031, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Supportive interventions required. new text end new text begin (a) A district or school must provide supportive interventions for both the target and the actor involved in a bullying incident. new text end new text begin (b) Supportive interventions for the actor may include: new text end new text begin (1) an assessment of potential underlying causes of behavior, including trauma, unmet mental health needs, or experiences of exclusion; new text end new text begin (2) access to appropriate mental health services and counseling; new text end new text begin (3) educational supports and skill-building interventions focused on empathy, conflict resolution, and healthy relationships; and new text end new text begin (4) engagement of the student's parent or guardian, when appropriate, in the development and implementation of the support plan. new text end new text begin (c) Supportive interventions for the target must include access to counseling, mental health services, and other resources designed to restore safety and well-being. new text end new text begin (d) A district or school must ensure that supportive interventions are implemented equitably and do not disproportionately exclude or punish students based on race, ethnicity, national origin, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability status, or other protected characteristics. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.035, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. School district and charter school policy. (a) A school board and a charter school must adopt a crisis management policy to address potential violent crisis situations in the district or charter school. The policy must be developed cooperatively with administrators, teachers, employees, students, parents, community members, law enforcement agencies, other emergency management officials, county attorney offices, social service agencies, emergency medical responders, and any other appropriate individuals or organizations. The policy must include at least five school lock-down drills, five school fire drills consistent with section 299F.30, and one tornado drill.new text begin The policy must address the unique needs of students with disabilities including students with mobility restrictions, sensory needs, developmental or physical disabilities, mental health needs, and auditory or visual limitations. If the student's disability affects the student's safety in a crisis situation, a plan for the student's safety must be included in the student's individualized education program or 504 plan.new text end (b) A school board or a charter school may adopt the model cardiac emergency response plan provided by the commissioner under subdivision 1. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 121A.224, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. High school students. A school district or charter school deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end allow a student in grades 9 through 12 to possess and administer an opiate antagonist to another high school student. The protections of section 604A.04 apply to the possession and administration of opiate antagonists according to this section. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 121A.241, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin CPR and AED training. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, all high school and middle school athletic coaches and assistant coaches employed by a school district or charter school must obtain and maintain current training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and the use of an automated external defibrillator (AED). After obtaining initial training, coaches and assistant coaches must receive training at least once every two calendar years thereafter on an ongoing basis. Training must be consistent with national, evidence-based, emergency cardiovascular care guidelines. new text end new text begin (b) An individual described in this section who performs CPR or uses an AED in the course of that individual's employment as an athletic coach is not liable in a civil action for damages resulting from an act or omission occurring in that performance, except for an act or omission constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.425, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Disciplinary dismissals prohibited. (a) A pupil enrolled in deleted text begin the following is not subject to dismissals under this chapter:deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end a preschool or prekindergarten program, including an early childhood family education, school readiness, school readiness plus, voluntary prekindergarten, Head Start, or other school-based preschool or prekindergarten programdeleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin is not subject to dismissals under this chapter.new text end deleted text begin (2) kindergarten through grade 3. deleted text end (b) This deleted text begin provisiondeleted text end new text begin subdivisionnew text end does not apply to a dismissal from school for less than one school day, except as provided under chapter 125A and federal law for a student receiving special education services. new text begin (c) A pupil enrolled in kindergarten through grade 3 may only be dismissed for a period of up to one partial day and one full day of school immediately following an incident where the pupil's actions inflicted or were reasonably likely to inflict upon themselves or another person at the school: new text end new text begin (1) bodily harm causing a significant physical injury or physical trauma or with the potential to cause significant physical injury or physical trauma; new text end new text begin (2) substantial bodily harm; or new text end new text begin (3) great bodily harm. new text end new text begin (d) "Bodily harm," "substantial bodily harm," and "great bodily harm" have the meanings given them in section 609.02, subdivisions 7, 7a, and 8. new text end new text begin (e) A pupil in kindergarten through grade 3 must not be dismissed for conduct: new text end new text begin (1) that was not likely to inflict bodily harm, substantial bodily harm, or great bodily harm upon themselves or another person at school; new text end new text begin (2) characterized as disruptive or disorderly; new text end new text begin (3) causing damage to property, but not to themselves or another person; or new text end new text begin (4) that was verbal and not likely to result in bodily harm, substantial bodily harm, or great bodily harm to others. new text end new text begin (f) If a pupil is dismissed under this subdivision, the school must communicate with the pupil's parent or guardian regarding the incident. After a second dismissal and within five school days of the incident causing the second dismissal, the school must convene a meeting of the pupil's primary instructor, school counseling staff, their parent or guardian, and, if applicable, individualized education program team members to identify and discuss the following: new text end new text begin (1) factors that may have contributed to the incident, including but not limited to student skill deficits, staff skill deficits, sensory or environmental factors, emotional or physical trauma, and other external factors; and new text end new text begin (2) a plan to address missing student or staff skills or, where applicable, necessary mental health supports. new text end new text begin (g) The pupil's return to school must not be dependent upon convening the meeting according to paragraph (f). new text end new text begin (h) A school administrator must use the dismissal time to prepare for the pupil's reentry to school. The dismissal must be reported consistent with section 121A.53. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end Notwithstanding this subdivision, expulsions and exclusions may be used only after resources outlined in subdivision 2 have been exhausted, and only in circumstances where there is an ongoing serious safety threat to the child or others. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.49, is amended to read: 121A.49 APPEAL. A party to an exclusion or expulsion decision made under sections 121A.40 to 121A.56 may appeal the decision to the commissioner of education within 21 calendar days of school board action. Upon being served with a notice of appeal, the district shall provide the commissioner and the parent or guardian with a complete copy of the hearing recordnew text begin , including a written transcript of the expulsion hearing,new text end within five days of its receipt of the notice of appeal. All written submissions by the appellant must be submitted and served on the respondent within ten days of its actual receipt of thenew text begin hearing record, including the writtennew text end transcript. All written submissions by the respondent must be submitted and served on the appellant within ten days of its actual receipt of the written submissions of the appellant. The decision of the school board must be implemented during the appeal to the commissioner. In an appeal under this section, the commissioner may affirm the decision of the agency, may remand the decision for additional findings, or may reverse or modify the decision if the substantial rights of the petitioners have been prejudiced because the administrative findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are: (1) in violation of constitutional provisions; (2) in excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the school district; (3) made upon unlawful procedure, except as provided in section 121A.48; (4) affected by other error of law; (5) unsupported by substantial evidence in view of the entire record submitted; or (6) arbitrary or capricious. The commissioner or the commissioner's representative shall make a final decision based upon the record. The commissioner shall issue a decision within 30 calendar days of receiving the entire record and the parties' written submission on appeal. The commissioner's decision shall be final and binding upon the parties after the time for appeal expires under section 121A.50. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.73, is amended to read: 121A.73 SCHOOL CELL PHONE POLICY. new text begin (a) new text end A school district or charter school must adopt a policy on students' possession and use of cell phones in school by March 15, 2025. The Minnesota Elementary School Principals' Association and the Minnesota Association of Secondary School Principals must collaborate to make best practices available to schools on a range of different strategies in order to minimize the impact of cell phones on student behavior, mental health, and academic attainment. new text begin (b) Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, a school district or charter school cell phone policy must prohibit cell phones, smart glasses, and smart watches in school for students in kindergarten through grade 8 and prohibit cell phones, smart glasses, and smart watches in classrooms for students in grades 9 through 12. The policy must provide exceptions for devices necessary for medical use, exceptions for devices included in an individualized education program for a student with a disability, or other exceptions at the discretion of the school principal. A school district or charter school with a school building that includes a combination of elementary, middle, or secondary students must adopt a policy under this section that prohibits cell phones, smart glasses, and smart watches in school or in classrooms. A student in kindergarten through grade 8 in a building where cell phones, smart glasses, and smart watches are prohibited may bring their device into the building according to a locally adopted policy, but the student must not use the device during the school day. new text end new text begin (c) This section does not apply to students receiving full-time online instruction away from a school district or charter school. new text end ARTICLE 7 LIBRARIES AND SCHOOL BOARDS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.09, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. School board membership. new text begin (a) new text end The care, management, and control of independent districts is vested in a board of directors, to be known as the school board. The term of office of a member shall be four years commencing on the first Monday in January and until a successor qualifies. The membership of the board shall consist of six elected directors together with such ex officio member as may be provided by law. deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin (b) Those districts with a six-member new text end board may submit to the electors at any school election the question whether the board shall consist of seven members. If a majority of those voting on the proposition favor a seven-member board, a seventh member shall be elected at the next election of directors for a four-year term and thereafter the board shall consist of seven members. new text begin (c) new text end Those districts with a seven-member board may submit to the electors at any school election at least 150 days before the next election of three members of the board the question whether the board shall consist of six members. If a majority of those voting on the proposition favor a six-member board instead of a seven-member board, three members instead of four members shall be elected at the next election of the board of directors and thereafter the board shall consist of six members. new text begin (d) Those districts with a six-member board and in which 1,000 or fewer students are enrolled on October 1 of the preceding calendar year may submit to the electors at any school election the question whether the board shall consist of five members. If a majority of those voting on the proposition favor a five-member board, only two members shall be elected at the next election of the board of directors for a four-year term and thereafter the board shall consist of five members. new text end new text begin (e) Those districts with a five-member board may submit to the electors at any school election at least 150 days before the next election of two members of the board the question whether the board shall consist of six members. If a majority of those voting on the proposition favor a six-member board instead of a five-member board, three members instead of two members shall be elected at the next election of the board of directors and thereafter the board shall consist of six members. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 123B.09, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Student representation. The school board deleted text begin is encouraged todeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end adopt a process to include student representation to advise the school board. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 134.351, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Services. Each multicounty, multitype library system deleted text begin is encouraged todeleted text end new text begin maynew text end develop services including, but not limited to the following: deleted text begin referral of usersdeleted text end new text begin resource sharing and consultingnew text end , intrasystem reciprocal borrowing, cooperative collection development, deleted text begin cooperativedeleted text end new text begin facilitation ofnew text end reference services, staff development, research and development, deleted text begin cooperative storage facilitiesdeleted text end new text begin maintenance of collections focused on member library interestnew text end , publicity and community relations. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 134.351, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Governance. (a) In any area where the boundaries of a proposed multicounty, multitype library system coincide with the boundaries of the regional library system or district, the regional library system or district board deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be designated as the governing board for the multicounty, multitype library system. In any area where a proposed multicounty, multitype library system encompasses more than one regional library system or district, the governing board of the multicounty, multitype library system deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end consist of nine members appointed by the cooperating regional library system or district boards from their own membership in proportion to the population served by each cooperating regional library system or district. In each multicounty, multitype library system there deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin maynew text end be established an advisory committee consisting of two representatives of public libraries, two representatives of school media services, one representative of special libraries, one representative of public supported academic libraries, and one representative of private academic libraries. The advisory committee deleted text begin shall recommend needed policydeleted text end new text begin may make recommendations on services and programsnew text end to the system governing board. (b) Upon recommendation from its advisory committee, a multitype library cooperation system governing board may choose to reconstitute the governance of the multitype system by the creation of a combined board which replaces the previous governing board and advisory committee. A combined board deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end consist of five or seven citizens, not employed in library or information services, and four library or information service workers. The constituent regional public library system boards deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end select the citizen members from the at-large population of the region. In any area where a multicounty, multitype library system encompasses more than one regional public library system, cooperating regional system boards deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end appoint citizen members of the combined board members in proportion to the population of each cooperating regional system. The combined board members who are library and information workers deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be selected, one from each type of library: academic, public, school, and special. Governing board members of the combined board deleted text begin shalldeleted text end serve two-year terms for no more than three successive terms with the members of the first combined board serving one- and two-year terms as determined by lot with a simple majority serving for two years. Elections deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be pursuant to the adopted bylaws of the multitype system and may provide additional requirements to those in this section. New combined governing boards deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end take effect at the beginning of the fiscal year, July 1, and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end continue the authority, ownership, and obligations of the previously constituted multitype system in its region. new text begin (c) In a multitype library cooperation system that has been incorporated into or otherwise joined with a regional public library system there must be a combined governing board that includes voting representatives from all types of libraries. The combined board members, who are library and information workers, must be nominated by their peers. Public libraries must nominate and vote for a public library representative. School libraries must nominate and vote for a school library representative. Academic libraries must nominate and vote for an academic library representative. Special libraries must nominate and vote for a special library representative. This election must take place during a regular meeting of the governing board, called in accordance with the provisions of its bylaws, or by electronic communication or by using email or an online survey or voting tool. A board member is not eligible to serve more than three consecutive three-year terms. new text end new text begin (d) In an area where the boundaries of a multicounty, multitype library system coincides with the boundaries of the regional library system, upon recommendation of its advisory committee, governing board, and the board of the regional public library system involved in governance under paragraph (a) or (b), the library system may choose to reconstitute the governance of the multicounty, multitype library system to be an independent board by severing the appointment responsibility of regional public library system boards. new text end new text begin (e) A multitype cooperation system board formed according to paragraph (d), consists of five or seven citizens, not employed in library or information services, and four library or information service workers. The board must be self-sustaining by allowing the board to solicit members and voting to accept the members. The multitype cooperation system board must establish bylaws that define a method of selection of citizens and information workers, one from each type of library, academic, public, school, and special libraries, as members of the governing board. During the last quarter of each fiscal year of the system, the governing board members must elect members to replace those whose terms expire at the end of the fiscal year. This election must take place during a regular meeting of the governing board, called in accordance with the provisions of its bylaws, or by electronic communication or by using email or an online survey or voting tool. New board members must be elected by a majority of board members present at such a meeting, provided there is a quorum present. Board members elected must serve a term beginning on the first day of the next fiscal year. All board members serve two-year terms and are eligible for reelection for up to three consecutive terms. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [134.52] ELECTRONIC BOOK AND DIGITAL AUDIOBOOK LICENSES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Aggregator" means any person in the business of licensing access to electronic literary material collections that include electronic literary material from multiple publishers. new text end new text begin (c) "Borrower" means any person or organization, including another library, to whom a library loans a copy of electronic literary material. new text end new text begin (d) "Digital audiobook" means a sound recording of a reading of any literary production that has been converted into or published in a digital audio file that may be listened to on a computer or portable electronic device. new text end new text begin (e) "Electronic book" means a text document that has been converted into or published in a digital format that may be read on a computer or portable electronic device. new text end new text begin (f) "Electronic literary material" means any digital audiobook or electronic book. new text end new text begin (g) "Library" means: new text end new text begin (1) a library that provides free access to all residents of a city or county, receives at least half of its financial support from public funds, and is organized under the provisions of this chapter, except that a library under this clause does not include libraries that are law, medical, or other specific libraries organized to serve a special group of persons and not the general public; new text end new text begin (2) a library jointly operated by a city and a school district under section 134.195; new text end new text begin (3) a school district or charter school library or media center under section 124D.991, including libraries operated by an intermediate school district or cooperative unit under section 123A.24, subdivision 2; or new text end new text begin (4) the Minitex library network. new text end new text begin (h) "Loan" means the creation and transmission by a library to a borrower of a copy of any electronic literary material and the deletion of such copy by the library upon the expiration of the loan period. new text end new text begin (i) "Loan period" means the period of time commencing with the creation and transmission by a library to a borrower of a copy of any electronic literary material and concluding with the deletion of the copy by the library, as determined by the library. new text end new text begin (j) "Portable electronic device" means any self-contained electronic device for personal use for communicating, reading, viewing, listening, playing video games, or computing, including but not limited to a mobile telephone, tablet computer, electronic book reader, or other similar device. new text end new text begin (k) "Technological protection measure" means any technology that enhances the security of loaning or circulating electronic literary materials by a library. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Applicability. new text end new text begin (a) The provisions of this section shall apply to any contract or license agreement entered into or renewed by a library in the state with a vendor for the license of any electronic literary material on and after 60 days following the date the secretary of state, as certified by the state librarian, determines that a substantially similar law to the provisions of this section has been enacted in one or more states, not including this state, and the aggregate population of such state or states equals at least 7,000,000, as enumerated in the most recent United States decennial census. Each quarter, starting July 1, the state librarian must certify to the secretary of state the number of states that have enacted any such substantially similar laws until the number certified reaches the aggregate population requirement. new text end new text begin (b) No later than 30 days after the date the secretary of state, in consultation with the state librarian, makes the determination in accordance with paragraph (a), the state librarian must electronically notify the commissioner of education and all libraries operated by a state agency of the determination and the date the requirements of this section become effective. The secretary of state and commissioner of education must ensure that the determination and effective date are posted on the websites of the Office of the Secretary of State and the Department of Education. The secretary of state must electronically notify the Office of the Revisor of Statutes of the determination and effective date. The secretary of state must electronically notify all counties, cities, and towns of this state and the commissioner of education shall electronically notify all public schools, of the determination and effective date. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Contract requirements. new text end new text begin On and after 60 days following the date of determination by the secretary of state, in consultation with the state librarian, under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), no library in the state may enter into or renew any contract or license agreement with a vendor that precludes, limits, or restricts the library from performing customary operational or lending functions, including any provision that: new text end new text begin (1) prohibits the library from loaning any electronic literary material, including through any interlibrary loan system; new text end new text begin (2) restricts the number of times the library may loan any electronic literary material over the course of the contract or license agreement if such contract or agreement also restricts the library's loan period for electronic literary material; new text end new text begin (3) limits the number of electronic literary material licenses the library may purchase on the same date such electronic literary material is made available for purchase by the public; new text end new text begin (4) prohibits the library from making nonpublic preservation copies of any electronic literary material; new text end new text begin (5) restricts the library from disclosing the terms of the contract or license agreement to any other library in the state; new text end new text begin (6) restricts the duration of the contract or license agreement for electronic literary material unless the library also has the option of a contract or license agreement on commercially reasonable terms in consideration of the library's mission, that either: new text end new text begin (i) is based on a pay-per-use model; or new text end new text begin (ii) provides for the perpetual public use of the electronic literary material; new text end new text begin (7) requires the library to violate the provisions of section 13.40; new text end new text begin (8) provides that the contract or license agreement is not severable from any provision within the contract or agreement that is found in a judicial forum to be prohibited by this subdivision; or new text end new text begin (9) allows the enforcement of any of the provisions prohibited by this subdivision other than in a judicial forum. new text end ARTICLE 8 STATE AGENCIES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.353, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Duties; powers. (a) The school trust lands director shall: (1) act in a fiduciary capacity for trust beneficiaries in accordance with the principles under section 127A.351; (2) evaluate the school trust land asset position; (3) determine the estimated current and potential market value of school trust lands; (4) advise and provide recommendations to the governor on school trust land management policies and other policies that may affect the goal of the permanent school fund under section 127A.31; (5) advise and provide recommendations to the Executive Council and Land Exchange Board on all matters regarding school trust lands presented to either body; (6) advise and provide recommendations to the commissioner of natural resources on managing school trust lands, including but not limited to advice and recommendations on: (i) Department of Natural Resources school trust land management plans; (ii) leases of school trust lands; (iii) royalty agreements on school trust lands; (iv) land sales and exchanges; (v) cost certification; and (vi) deleted text begin revenue generatingdeleted text end new text begin revenue-generatingnew text end options; (7) serve as temporary trustee of school trust lands for school trust lands subject to proposed or active eminent domain proceedings; (8) serve as temporary trustee of school trust lands pursuant to section 94.342, subdivision 5; deleted text begin (9) submit to the Legislative Permanent School Fund Commission for review an annual budget and management plan for the director that includes proposed legislative changes that will improve the asset allocation of the school trust lands; deleted text end deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end develop and implement a ten-year strategic plan and a 25-year framework for management of school trust lands, in conjunction with the commissioner of natural resources, that is updated every five years, with goals to: (i) retain core real estate assets; (ii) increase the value of the real estate assets and the cash flow from those assets; (iii) rebalance the portfolio in assets with high performance potential and the strategic disposal of selected assets; (iv) establish priorities for management actions; (v) balance revenue enhancement and resource stewardship; and (vi) advance strategies on school trust lands to capitalize on ecosystem services markets; and deleted text begin (11) keep the beneficiaries, governor, legislature, and the public informed about the work of the director by reportingdeleted text end new text begin (10) reportnew text end to the Legislative Permanent School Fund Commission deleted text begin in a public meeting at least once during each calendar quarterdeleted text end new text begin as required under subdivision 5new text end . (b) In carrying out the duties under paragraph (a), the school trust lands director may: (1) direct and control money appropriated to the director; (2) establish job descriptions and employ staff within the limitations of money appropriated to the director; (3) enter into interdepartmental agreements with any other state agency; (4) enter into joint powers agreements under chapter 471; (5) evaluate and initiate real estate development projects on school trust lands in conjunction with the commissioner of natural resources and with the advice of the Legislative Permanent School Fund Commission to generate long-term economic return to the permanent school fund; and (6) submit recommendations on strategies for school trust land leases, sales, or exchanges to the commissioner of natural resources and the Legislative Permanent School Fund Commission. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 127A.353, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15 each year, the school trust lands director must submit a written report to the Legislative Permanent School Fund Commission. The report must inform trust beneficiaries, the governor, the legislature, and the public about school trust land management activities, and must include information on: new text end new text begin (1) the director's efforts to develop and advocate for sustainable asset management strategies that reflect undivided loyalty to the trust beneficiaries; new text end new text begin (2) school trust land management policies and activities, including new or emerging revenue-generating opportunities; new text end new text begin (3) the financial position of school trust land assets, including management costs for the preceding fiscal year and the revenues deposited in the permanent school fund; new text end new text begin (4) recommended statutory changes that would improve asset allocation, enhance financial outcomes, or otherwise strengthen the long-term performance of school trust lands; and new text end new text begin (5) amounts distributed from the permanent school fund to public school districts and charter schools in the preceding fiscal year. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of natural resources and the commissioner of education must provide the director with the data necessary to complete the report. new text end new text begin (c) The report must be submitted in accordance with section 3.195. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: S3870-1 120B.124 READ ACT IMPLEMENTATION PARTNERSHIP. Subd. 6. Comprehensive review of literacy materials. Starting in 2033, the department and an institution of higher education may partner to conduct a comprehensive review of curriculum and intervention materials to identify literacy curriculum and supporting materials, and intervention materials that are evidence-based, focused on structured literacy, culturally and linguistically responsive, and reflect diverse populations. The department must post on its website the rubrics used to evaluate curriculum and intervention materials. The department must revise the list of approved curriculum and supporting materials, and intervention materials based on the findings of the review. 124E.16 REPORTS. Subd. 4. Authorizer performance evaluation report. (a) A charter school must publish on its website the formal written performance evaluation from its authorizer and disseminate the evaluation to enrolled families in languages they understand, consistent with the school's language access plan under section 124E.03, subdivision 9, paragraph (b). (b) Evaluations must be published on the charter school's website within 15 business days of receipt of the evaluation by the charter school and for at least 365 days from the date of publication.